1: it helped me through my cancer treatment.haveing trouble getting off it.
2: I just started taking this med. I have had two knee replacements and a hip replaced, painfull still after 6 years. Anexiety over money(who does not). First night on .5 mg nothing second same third night took two and got my first 8 hours sleep in 6 years only woke up once and went right back to sleep. Have heard it is addictive but I would rather get some sleep. I was to the point that i was afraid to do much driving in the car due to lack of concentration and confusion that arrises from lack of sleep . hope it continues to work will up date as time goes by.Read More Read Less
3: Well trough the years I have been suffering wirh social anxity and panic attatck , I have been on severl Meds , and I really like the product that I am reciving I works very      Michelle 30
4: I have OCD and anxiety, and Seasonal Affectiveness Disorder. I was prescribed 1 mg. every 8 hours or as needed 5 days ago. They also gave me a dose of it in the hospital via IV. I have taken it the past 4 days in a row with no side effects except I feel calmer, happier and a little sleepy but still totally functional. I started taking it in the evening so if I had any side effects maybe I could sleep through them. I am taking it earlier each day so I can benifit from the calming effects more. I am still only taking 1 pill a day. I am worried about possible side effects that could happen and addiction. But I don't want to stop taking it because it is really helping. (BTW I was in the hospital for a kidney infection not anxiety, the dr. felt I was having anxiety) Most of the reviews so far have been very positive, can anyone give me some advice on what side effects are most common, how soon side effects happen,(I've been taking it 5 days now) and how addicting it actually is? I don't really take much medicines, just tylenol and I take some herbal remidies like ST. Johns wort and Evening Primrose Oil
5: I first was diagnosed with Autism, Bipolar, Depression and then anxiety. This medication has helped me sleep at night along with two hydrocodone for chest wall pain. I only take the two at night thoguh because both make you feel sleepy. The Bipolar has been ruled out and so has the depression. There is still Autism at times but this medication is wonderful for anxiety and panic attacks that come at any level (whether strong or moderate). I am both a Certified Nursing Assistant and Emergency Medical Technician and find the Ativan especially helpful on very stressfull days and alot of those days just happen to fall on the day i am having chest wall pain. So If you have chest pain with your anxious feelings try adding a little bit of hydrocodone with your dr's persmission. When you get anxious your muscles tighten up as well, even your throat and airway. Hope this helps for some of you because it sure helped me.Read More Read Less
6: Due to other health issues I was a mess. No appetite, trouble sleeping. Always a racing mind and the feeling of anxiousness all the time making me sick. My first dose was like the miracle drug. Within 30 minutes or so I started to feel much better, in fact I really didn't notice I was feeling better until I thought about it. It brought back my appetite and helps me fall asleep and stay sleeping. My mind is not racing anymore either. My concern is stopping this drug. I've heard nightmare stories about withdrawing off of this drug, if abused. But if you take it for more than 6 months, you're already "addicted" to it and WILL get severe withdrawals if you stop suddenly. For now it's working for me, but I know I can't stay on this medication for too long.   Read More Read Less
7: I have taken this med for about 8 months and it kinda slows me down for about an hour and then i am right back to if not worse on my anxiety. I have not noticed any tolerance change since the first time that i took it.
8: I started this medicine and I am on my third dose. I can not function. I can only sleep, keeping my eyes open for more than three minutes. It is horrible my body is not adjusting to this medicine.
9: many side effects        im slow veryslow AT GETTING MY DAILY ACTIIVITIES. DIZZINES UN Balanced, nausua. etc. im so vry rxhausted
10: I have taken very low doses of lorazepam for a few years for help sleeping.  It worked very well.  Made me relax pretty good.  When I was prescribed Buspar for anxiety I decided to stop the lorazepam.  I did go through some withdrawal symptoms like rapid heartbeat, shaking hands, tingling in arms and legs and trouble sleeping.  However after 2 weeks - all that is gone and I feel fine.
11: I was taking this med. for anxiety/panic disorder.Iwas taking alprazolam and my dr. changed me to this med. but the alprazolam was so much more effective my Dr. switched me back.I found this med. did not work quick enough or long in it's ability to help my attacks
12: Realy knocks down anxiety. Also very effective in getting to sleep---no hangover.
13: this medication has been very helpful with my manic depression , anxiety , panic attacks. it is shorter acting then the most benzodiazopines, so it is less sedating , for me at least ,
14: good
15: I take 4 mg lorazepam to help sleep.  I take it around 11 pm., but it usually only gives me 5 hrs of sleep, then wide awake.  Still tired, but wide awake.  Was on xanax (alprazolam) but Dr wanted me off that since I was on it for many years.  I was only up to 1.5 mg at night, but wanted 2 mg.  She said no, and switched me to lorazepam 4 mg instead. I think the alprazolam worked better for sleep.
16: It seems to have taken just the edge off my anxiety.  I feel I need a stronger dose.
17: I know this is probably too quick to be putting out a review but I just started taking Lorazepam because of not being able to shut my brain down when I go to bed. I've taken it 3 nights now and suddenly I'm feeling really really miserable and depressed. I just wanna keep crying for no stupid reason at all. Is this a normal side effect??? Will this feeling go away?
18: 10mg tid. 20+ years. No bad effects. We used to call it ativan.
19: i take this for anxiety/not being able to sleep been taking 2mg everynight for about 9mo and every so often before that last 5 yrs (briefly stopping during pregnancy/breastfeeding) its great and effective.
20: It makes me feel shaky, nervous, and sleeplesness. I was sleeping all the time because of dipresion. My Dr. put me on it for suffering from anxiety/long lasting panic ataks
21: SEEMS TO CALM YOUR FEELINGS DOWN, TOOK AWAY THE SHAKES AND IRREGULAR BREATHING.
22: No problems
23: I was prescribed for anxiety, years ago. I discovered it was great for sleep, with no hang over, like most sleeping pills give. After of 40 years of drinking daily, I recently quit with little problems. First by no alcohol in house for 3 months, and then switching to soda in the bar. I am sober for 3 weeks. I quit for heart problems, and don't intend on going back. I just realized lorazapam reduces effects of alcohol withdraw. Thank you for helping me sleep, and quitting drinking. 2 mg. at bed time.Read More Read Less
24: I have been taking 2mg at night every night for severe chronic insomnia. I am a livid dreamer and they are horrible dreams. For the first year I took this medication it prevented my dreams and while I still had awful insomnia it was improved.  It has recently stopped working (nearly 2 years later) and if I don't take it every night then I go into severe withdrawal the next day. I recently wasn't able to take it for a few days and went into full withdrawal with severe anxiety, cold sweats, and shaking. after talking to my doctor about this it is apparently very common.  Lorazepam has worked wonders in my life, but just be aware that your body does become dependent on and addicted to it
25: originally ordered to assist with sleeping and then for treatment of  fibromyalgia and MS
26: pls explain what ATIVAN is used for? dr prescribed ~4 months ago.
27: Disaffection resulted.
28: havent been on long e-nuff yet to really tell but I dont think it is working  still not sleeping and I can never be calm!!
29: I am taking chemo, and not sleeping at all on chemo nights once a week.  I would lie awake for 6 hours and then sleep about an hour and a half. The chem Dr's. staff suggested this medication. I took it last night and was awake nearly all night again. I cat napped from midnight to 3:17 a.m., and then did not sleep again. The dosage says to take one, and nothing about taking two if the one doesn't do the job.  I'm disappointed and will call my medical people to check into a possible alternative.
30: Has been life saver no side affects
31: it works but not fast enough and its very addictive
32: I'M USING IT FOR THE PANIC ATTACKS I'M HAVEING WHILE QUITING SMOKING FOR THE PAST 41 YEARS IT REALLY HELPS! i CAN NOW SLEEP AT NIGHT
33: Able to sleep better through the night.  Still get up to urinate but getting more rest.  Muscle spasms are occasional depending on specific or quick movements.  It's only been a month and lowest dose of .5mg.  Concerned about addiction......
34: Lucky I haven't been pulled over. I wobble and can't form words, mumble.  too many side effects on the list are on my list of complaints. I'm weaning off. But it's 25 % over two weks to go down to 1 less MG.  I'm donw to three. Tried of people thinking I'm a drunk.  Big issue with slurred speech which gets worse the closer it gets to dose time?  I'd like to get off of this once and for all and enjoy Christmas, but I can do with out any seizures. Any suggestions for anti-anexitry/stress?  This cure IS worse than thte disease.Read More Read Less
35: I take it for panic attacks.  I take it as needed.  I still have panic attacks about three times a week, however they don't last as long as they used to now that I am taking this medicine
36: Have taken 1 mg at bedtime for 3 years.  It makes me sleep like a baby w/o any side effects whatever. I wake refreshed and ready to go in the mornings. What a God send!
37: IT HAS HELPED ME FEEL NORMAL AND FREE WOULD LIKE TO STOP ON DAY AND NOT NEED THIS ANYMORE BUT UNTIL THAT DAY IM GLAD GOD GAVE ME SUMTHING THAT WORKS FOR MY CONDITION
38: I have a bad heart and some times it goes into arhtyma and it sacres me
39: Caused more depression.  Have a day where I don't know what happened.  Caused loss of memory and unconcious behaviours
40: I still have the shakes nad butterflys in my stomach I am taking 2gm three times aday. Fot thw last 3-4 months I have lost weight from 130 to 95 as of today. Now my Dr. called today and wants me to stop taking it, what replacement is available for me., or should I taper off of the drug.
41: this has helped me with my social anexity, and uncontroled rage.
42: I have taken this for over 5 years, starting with cancer.  I am now 4 months cancer free... not one doctor ever asked why in these last few years.  Now from researh i have a lot of the "severe" symptons.  I am scared, can I stop all at once?  HELP... The symptons are awful...
43: I've been taking Lorazepam (or Ativan) for two years for menopausal insomnia.  Of all the drugs I've tried, it has been the most helpful with the least side effects. I try not to take it every night and go off it for months at a time. It was most effective when I first started taking it; I quickly developed a tolerance and needed a higher dose which I didn't want to take so I just continued to take .5 or less. I generally take .25. It does help me fall asleep and wake up less often and sleep more soundly.  It only makes me a little groggy and the withdrawal symptoms when I stop taking it have been minimal--headache and slightly shaky feeling. I don't like being dependent on any drug but it's better than not sleeping! There are times when it's been a great relaxant and stress reliever.Read More Read Less
44: I have  been on 1 mg 2 times daily for about l0 years for panic attacks and it has been wonderful.  It calms me and makes the days go by with no worries.I had no idea that it was habit forming until (due to circumstances beyond my control) I  found out I only ha enough on my last perscription to last 15 days.  I called my MD (who prescribes this) and they would not authorize  enough pills  to get me through until I could get it refilled on 7/1.  Nothing was said about WITHDRAWELL , just they were sorry and could not help me and hope I made it through until 7/1. This has been AWFUL and I am coping the best I can.Read More Read Less
45: the draw back to the drug is that I do not remember the day I used the drug
46: I was at wits end with chronic pain and panic attacks. My mind was racing so much I couldn't sit still. This has been going on for about 2-3 years now. I have no appetite and have lost over 100 lbs within 1 1/2 years. All without dieting!! My doctors thought I had pancreatic cancer, but that wasn't it. It turns out the (Statin) Lipitor I was taking for my cholesterol was eating at my liver making me sick. It also ate thru my gallbladder and the bile tubes connected to it. I have that removed and everything got worse. My kidneys are loaded with stones, my prostrate is enlarged and needs to come out. It's being tested as we speak to see if it's cancerous. With my lack of luck, it will be.     The Lorazepam I was prescribed two weeks ago have been working great!! I'm able to sleep, my appetite came back, my stomach isn't tied up in knots anymore. I'm still in a lot of pain, but other ailments have seemed to subsided themselves, for now. I have a lot of tests coming up in my future. I only hope I'm strong enough to go thru each one of them.....
47: luv luv luv it
48: Sick, dizzy, muscle ache,head ache,very tired
49: This medicine has been a life saver for me and my anxiety.
50: anxiety from life's stresses this med helped sleep pattern and calmed anxiety 1mg up 2 3 times a day as needed. only average 1 or 2 a day easy use would recommend highly!!
51: Lorazepam has help to instantly ease me when feelings of anxiousness begin to arise. It has helped me to become more focused on situations when anxiety begins to set in.
52: take it only as needed......overuse will make you feel lethargic..........taken properly it has been great especially as an aid in going to sleep....with no side effects......
53: helps calm me down in times of severe anxiety or the on set of a panic attack
54: Based upon results of a sleep study and follow-up with clinical psychologist, Lorazepam and Trazodone and Pramipexole were prescribed to enable restorative sleep.  I take the three exactly as directed.  On one occasion when I was away from home and had forgotten the Lorazepam, my sleep was intermittent and fitful.  The drug has made it possible for me to fulfill daily demands of running my household and caring for my mom - who lives with me and is in a state of progressive Dementia - without "crashing" for lack of sleep.Read More Read Less
55: The very first time my client took this med, there was an immediate improvement. He relaxed, slept for the first time in weeks, and had no more night sweats.
56: It helps with panic attachs over my valium but it never works when I need them too work on the spot.
57: I was prescribed this medication because I was having a hard time sleeping because my brain would not shut off.  I take it every night before I go to bed and I sleep soundly.  I've noticed, however, that my anxiety attacked have now reached during waking hours.  Although I've not been prescribed to take this during the day, I took one when I was getting that anxious feeling and within 20 minutes I was calm again without even noticing it.  I have not had any side effects so far.
58: i take wellbutrin for most of my depression and anxiety issues, but some days i feel that i could use some more help. when i am in a bad mood and everything is about to "throw me over the edge" this med really helps. i get really sleepy about 3 to 4 hrs. after i take it. i take .5 mg.    does anyone find that it has a lasting effect? like if i take it before bed, will it still be in my system in the morning?
59: My Dr. told me to stop taking lorazepam because it causes Dementia. It did help me.
60: does not last long enough
61: IT HELPS ME OUT 100%
62: It helps me fall asleep faster ans stay asleep longer
63: I take this PRN for anxiety. The other day I had what they call a Brain Zap (heard of it as a withdrawal symptom of paxil) Now I'm afraid to take my meds.
64: I don't feel the panic attacks as severly and they don't seem to be occuring as frequently.
65: 18 years daily use. It is well tolerated.
66: my doctor prescribed this drug not realizing or being to lazy to see there is an interaction with the other drugs  I was acting and feeling so odd .
67: I've been taking this for severral years now. My doctor prescibed 3 - 1mg per day, but just take one a day at bedtime and it has worked great. I haven't had aan anxiety attack since being on it. I stopped the 3 per day because it made me drowsey and couldn't functon well at work.
68: I was a nervous and anxious wreck before I was treated with Lorazepam. I've been on it almost a year now and I finally feel "normal" (whatever that is) This drug has really helped me get my life back together. It is wonderful for me and my family will agree that it is much better for all of us. Im a very satisfied consumer of this drug!
69: This drug has been a godsend for my chronic inmsomnia; after a few days there has been no hangover effect. Do expect some minor short term memory quirks at the begining of treatment, but this issue seems to regress with time.
70: not working as good as valium
71: I have really bad anxiety and along w/breathing techniques that my Dr. perscribed I feel I'm finally getting control of my life again.  I feel so normal, I forgot what it was like.  I only take 0.5 mg / day when needed, which is about 5days/week.
72: Really helps with anxiety.
73: newly diagnosed with breast cancer,facing major surgery and paralyzed by fear, couldn't sleep. my dr called in rx for 1mg to be taken as needed. took it for the first time last night and slept all night woke up feeling refreshed with out a knot in the pit of my stomach. for the first time in weeks! thank you i have been greatly helped by this, and don't expect to have to take very long just until my surgery is over and i am healed. god bless
74: When I start to feel anxious, my body/brain starts to feel tired and without something to break that cycle, I just drop what I'm doing and if I'm "lucky" I go to my bedroom or a dark, quiet place and take a nap. My doctor started me on this in addition to an anti-depressant, because my anxiety stops me from taking that last step to swim, go out to lunch, have a relaxed, honest conversation with people who are close to me, picking up the phone...you get what I mean, I hope. It is a very low dose- 1mg. up to four times a day. It does seem to quiet the anxiety and if I push myself I can do the things (above) that I would really like to do. However, even this low dose adds to my constant fatigue, which might just be a psychosomatic (?) symptom in the first place, I don't know. What I am trying to say is that this helps me sometimes to get out of myself and do things that make me nervous because I know if I would just do them, I will probably have a lot of fun from the experience.  Read More Read Less
75: I was taking this for tension in my neck and vertigo. I was on it for only 2.5 weeks and had to stop because it was VERY addictive. I was supposed to be taking 2 a day but ended up taking 3-5 (as needed) a day. I stopped cold turkey because it was making me very sick. It has now been almost two months since I've last taken it and I don't feel like myself at all. I can't concentrate, I'm very forgetfull, I don't know what I'm doing. Has anyone else felt this way?
76: this drug is horrible it is more addictive than street drugs i would never recommend any doctor prescribing this to anyone.the witdrawl symtoms are horrible but you have to have alot of will power to get off of it.
77: HAVE BEEN ON THIS FOR ABOUT 8 YEARS AND IT IS A LIFE SAVER-HAVE PANIC ATTACKS BUT ALSO SUFFER FROM ARTHRITIS/FIBROMAYLGIA--ITS WONDERFUL
78: I can't sleep without it, i tried tolower th dose, or quit and i couldn't sleep
79: makes me too tired. so much so that have to reduce the amount. However it has calmed me
80: Awful. Incoherent thinking. Slowed processing.  Inability to express thoughts clearly.
81: I take 1 mg before bed nightly, since recovering from cancer 5 years ago. It has combated my nightly insomnia. I have never had to increase my dosage.
82: lost the ability to control my urine most of the time  problem disappeared once I was off this drug for four days  I'd rather not sleep than wear Depends all of the time.
83: This med helped somewhat with anxiety attacks, but not at all with sleep. Had horrible nightmares, cooked and shopped in middle of night and remembered nothing about it. I would never take this drug again.
84: The listed side effects mirror the complaints for which it was prescribed. I have now been on 4x0.5mg Pd for some 14 months and need to ease myself off it. What dose reduction rate would be advisable?
85: I am using lorazepam as a sleep aid. Doctor prescribed. I had trouble going to sleep with a c-pap machine. this medication has helped me get 6 to 7 hrs.  It seems to make me groggy for several hrs.
86: When I take it.  I can usally feel calm with in seconds up to a minute after i take it.
87: I was not sleeping well; sometimes awake for two days at a time. Now, sleep every night.
88: I was taking care of my dying mother and it required a lot of me staying sane and being able to go through the whole dying process with her. I needed something to take the edge off without it interfering with my taking care of her. It was perfect.
89: This drug helps me to sleep…and works longer and more gently than xanax. It take awhile to work though, so if you have food on your stomach it will take at least an hour or more to kick in. It doesn't feel as habit forming as xanax either. I only take it a couple times a week so as not to lose its effectiveness..as your body will get used to it.
90: at first the drug worked okay but only for about 15 20 min. it seemed and now it completly knockes me out even if i take a half or even a quarter of one. mabey to much of the meds built up in my system ? I do have pretty severe anxiety on a daily basis
91: Taking ativan for my extreme anxiety works pretty well, I think I need a higher dose. I have 10 prn ativans a month. side effects made me dizzy and forget simple things more .
92: Started taking 0.5 mg. of this drug in the evening before going to bed....slept relatively fine, but woke up groggy.  Began to have more sleep problems, so doctor told me to take 2.....not a good idea.  I got absolutely NO sleep, was restless all night, and feel like crap this morning.   Now she wants me to try Trazadone, and I'm a little hesitant to take this.  I have very little depression and no anxiety....just can't get to sleep.  Not sure if this drug type is the best for me.
93: I have anxiety. I have had this medical condition sense I was a child. I had taken severl different med. that did not help the problem. However, this on help me to have a new out look on life.
94: i was given this drug for attacks of vertigo that were crippling me. just .5mg a day and i feel like i have gotten my life back. the only problem is if i run out before my next appointment i have with drawl symptoms that include dizziness, tingling in my hands, and headaches, doctors should not restrict meds that help people
95: it works great but i want to stop taking it have stopped for the past two days, don't know what it will do
96: My terminal boyfrind was given this among other meds to "make him comfortable" in his final weeks. I do not believe it helped as he further distanced himself & did not want to take any meds prescribed to him.    Would you be able to advise if it suitable to secure a court-appointed advocate in obtaining all of his medical records concerning his course of treatment as he left behind two young sons, one of whom has special needs of his own. Thank you!
97: This Rx helped me sleep after the death of my mom. Before, I would wake up after 4 hrs and not be able to go back to sleep.
98: Hospital gave Ativan to my father, didn't check on him for hours, finally discovered he was in respiratory distress, put him in ICU on a ventilator, he developed pneumonia and died. I wouldn't suggest it to my enemies.
99: After being diagnosed with Pulmonary Embolism I started having panic attacks and anxiety.  As soon as I feel an attack come on I take 1 Lorazepam and I am back to normal within 15 minutes.  I carry it with me everywhere.  It is a life saver for me!
100: Able to function on a daily basis and operate machinery without any trouble.
101: This drug has work very well for me to be able to sleep.
102: I took this drug (1 mg) once a day in the evenings following a long period of hospitalization after a leg amputation.  It helped me sleep and reduced mild anxiety.  My prescription was for 45 tablets, and I didn't attempt to renew the prescription.  So I stopped cold, and now after reading the data sheet on the drug, realized that was a mistake.  I went through about a 3-day withdrawal, during which I felt somewhat like a clockspring that had been wound too tight.  Great difficulty sleeping and a constant feeling that something ominous was about to happen.  Be careful taking this drug.  I've recently learned it was one of the drugs contributing to Michael Jackson's death.Read More Read Less
103: hello I ve been using this medication for several months I do notice a lot of memory loss cant remember where I put things feel like a stupid idot focus not good hop from different subjects help
104: i have been on lorazepam for 3 yrs., now.But with all drugs come side effects and i now want to stop but i,m scared of withdrawals.
105: I KNOW LONGER FEEL ANXIOUS AND CANT BREATH BUT IT ALSO MAKES ME PARINOID AND MORE OF A NERVIOUS RECK THAN BEFORE JUST WITH OUT THE ANXIETY
106: Been on the medication for several years.  At first the doctor wanted me to take this everyday to help but I have heard that this drug can be adictive and I am not the pill taking kind of individual so I only use it when things are really tough and it works.  I have not experienced any super side effects but the down fall with me is that it takes way too long (30mins) to work and occasion it has taken me out for the count.
107: IT CALMED MY HUSBAND DOWN COMPLETELY.
108: I've been taking this drug for over a year, 1mg right before bedtime for anxiety/insomnia.  I have had stressful sleep for years and have a really hard time staying asleep due to anxiety.  I'd rather have 5 hours a night of good sleep vs. 8 hours of stressful sleep.  It's like not sleeping at all.  The doctor said I need to take 1mg at night before bedtime to sleep well.  She said that taking it just once a day will not cause physical addiction because the half life is 12 hours.  So she said it's important to break that 12 hour cycle up to prevent physical addiction.  She said if I take it for a long time, less than 12 hours apart, apparently that's when you can get physically addicted.  The doctor said I may end up psyhologically addicted, but that's easy to kick shortly after I stop taking it.  1mg an hour before I want to go to sleep works absolutely great.  I haven't slept so good since I was a kid.  The doctor said that the only real side effects from this drug are addiction, and it's very important to get good sleep or I'll end up with other problems, like high blood pressure, heart problems, kidney problems, increased stress, etc.  So I feel any possible side effects of long term use of this drug is probably worth it.  I feel great, am probably healthier overall from it, and can get more out of life now that I don't have to walk around like a sleepless zombie all day.Read More Read Less
109: helps relieve anxiety, worry, stress
110: I was prescribed lorazepam when I was going through a difficult time in my life due to family issues and my parents' long term illness. My doctor suggested I take it only when and if I felt panicky or overwhelmed, but not on a daily basis. Most days I'm fine, but if I have a day when I feel unable to cope due to anxiety, I take it and within an hour I'm relaxed and able to cope better.
111: Been taking this for about 2 years after initial anxiety attack, it helps wonders,but can be adicting and physicians frown on giving it. For people with anxiety and panic attacks, it works great.
112: maybe i have a high tolerance, but i feel nothing from the 1mg tabs.
113: I started taking Lorazepam a month ago and have not noticed any difference in my nervousness. I did have some side effects when I first started the drug. I was like a Zombie in a foggy movie, I couldn't think either. So I went from taking .5mg twice a day to only .5mg at bedtime that helped with the side effects. Then after a couple of weeks I started taking the .5mg twice a day. I have an appointment to see my Dr soon and I'm not sure if this is a good drug to be on because of the addiction aspect of this drug. I will be discussing this with him.Read More Read Less
114: I just started this med but so far it seems to help.  I use it only as needed so hopfully there will be no dependance.  After my emergenct heart surgery I needed something to help take the edge off my worrying.
115: I took the medicine with an over the counter sleep aid and it caused halucinations, loss of memory, talking in my sleep and I almost ran my car off the road.
116: I was in a terrible mind and constantly panicking and it only made it worse.
117: I worry about not sleeping and takea 0.5 tabletafterI can't sleep when retiring but I sometimes take it after midnight and it often does not help.
118: I wanted to fix my anxiety so i went and seen my doctor! knowing that this drug is physically addictive she told me no more didnt ease me off or nothing was on lorazepam 1mg for 3 months and when it was working fine, just when you think a doctor wouldnt do that to you! i've been having non stop migraines and tension headaches, and all my muscles in my neck and shoulders are stiff and itsbeen a painful month!   thanks doc i wouldve been better off without these pills!
119: it has worked over a long period of time for me.
120: After years taking this med my 70 yr old mother became dependent, took more than she should but irratically, had a seizure, has involuntary muscle spazms, is confused and weak and stays in bed all day if she can get her hands on this drug.  NOT for the elderly.
121: finding them very hard to come off
122: I take this Drug for Anxiety I get when I wear my CPAC MASK. Hard to get to sleep without. Takes away that clostrophibic feeling with the mask. I also take Temazepam for sleep i do not take the at the same time as they are similar but work well together. No side effects except you need to have 8hours to sleep
123: I have anxiety for many years it made me have feelings of dread and life problems. Since taking 1mg 3xdaily I have improved, and am satisfied with my treatment.
124: I had a facial spasam and was diagnoised with anxiety, this drug has helped me with no side effects and also I sleep better, I have restless mind, too. No complaints here
125: I have slept the whole night thru when I used to wake up about 4am and couldn't fall back to sleep.  Now it isn't a problem any more.
126: given to my 72 yr old mother whom has COPD due to cigarette smoking for 55yrs. my concerns are; should it be used with a 21mg nicotine patch , advair & iprat/albut 0.5/3mg nebulizer these all have the same side effects to watch and very little info on other drug interactions
127: When I am in Afib I take 2 mg and it seems to calm me
128: I USE THIS TO HELP SLEEP.
129: works very well
130: helped me with stress from caretaker death of my wife
131: drowsiness, able to sleep
132: NONE YET USING XANAX.
133: I take it because I have a sleeping problem, even with taking this medication I never sleep more that 2 hours at a time. It doesn't seen to help but I don't have anything else to take. I feel I have nothing to loose by taking it...
134: makes me sleepy
135: Using it for insomnia. What is insomnia? Forgot what it felt like because guess what I have been sleeping! Thank you Heavenly Father! Oh and remember crack is wack!
136: I am on Buspirone for severe anxiety and panic disorder and was prescribed Lorazepam as a partner medication.  I didn't know why until my pharmacy didn't have the lorazepam in stock for 3 days.  I took the Buspirone alone and experienced uncontrollable quivering and major dizziness.  I had to call off work for 2 days and lost my job.  I love the lorazepam but my new medication specialist wants me off it now and to put me on antidepreesants!  What's up with that?
137: I've takn for 2 yrs, does the job but is highly addictive. Have not found a way to decrease without having increased anxiety and sleeplessness.
138: SLEEPING
139: It helps my nervousness and anxiety I only take it when I need it there is no dependancy or need to take daily medication for depression and anxiety.
140: My 77-year old grandmother has been on this medication for 12 years. Yesterday she was hospitalized for hypotension (a side effect) and nearly died. She is still in the hospital today.    It caused a paradoxical reaction of involuntary muscle spasm, which led doctors to incorrectly diagnose her with Parkinson's disease. She developed a high level of abuse of this drug and became sedated, and suicidal. It did not prevent her anxiety, but her addiction to the drug increased the anxiety.
141: I have been taking lorazepam for 6 years now for anxiety.  I love it!!! No sexual side effects, no weight gain... no side effects at ALL.  Works very well on my anxiety and eases me into a good night's sleep.  I take 1mg twice a day.
142: Lorazepam .5mg twice a day as needed is what I do because Doc prescribed me Sertaline (Zoloft) and that drug was making my anxiety and panic attacks worse. Plus Depression.  First time I too Lorazepam, I felt 60% calmer from what other drug did. So next time I took Lorazepam, it was prior to the Sertaline.  I felt very calm, more focused to get things done and not so scrabbled brain.  Then it was time to take the Sertaline...WOW...this pill doesnt work with me at all (only on it a week, 50mg). Going to tell Doctor on Friday to keep me on the Lorazepam, maybe even higher dose, and take me off Sertaline. I have to say I like the Lorazepam, kinda like the Klonapam I was on that Doctor took me off of when I moved here.Read More Read Less
143: I was taking a 1mg. pill 3 times a day for 2 weeks and had no anxious days. My instructions now are to take it as needed. Under the tounge work very quickly. I was also sleeping much better while on it consistantly but stopping cold turkey has returned me to sleeping 2-3 hrs. I take a 1mg pill and am able toget back to sleep. This is the as needed phase so it may take some time to figure out. May take one before going to bed.
144: I have on this medication for years just for sleeping.I cleep through the night and wake up in the morning refreshed.. ready for work.
145: This is a great med used in moderation. I use it when I have high anxiety or feel panicky. I only take it as needed, maybe once or twice a week. The more you take it the more it seems to be needed.
146: I have been taking 1mg at bedtime for 4 months. It works great. No major side effects
147: I used Lorazapam for major dental work. I only took 1 2mg pill prior to appointment. It was a huge help in lowering my anxiety. It also had the effect of lowering my memory of the procedure afterwards. I highly recommend it for this use. I do not take it on a continuing basis, only for single events. It made my dental visit much less seressful
148: Good for stress & anxiety, especially when caused by a bitch of an ex-wife!
149: I've been taking this medication for years. This December I got my refill and I noticed that the smell was different almost like paint thinner. I always put 1 under my tongue and let it dissolve but it would not dissolve I had to chew it up which I never had to do.  I'm on 2mg three times a day when I took the first pill it made my anxiety worse I don't know what kind of pills they are but they are definitely not real I've been having very bad withdrawal symptoms and I'm shaking can't focus can't sleep I'll call and talk to my pharmacist and I've a doctors appointment on Tuesday I can't wait I will never ever use this brand again
150: i have had chronic back pain for over 30 years from fibromyalgia and degenerative disc disease.  i have had 3 spinal surgeries with fusions and 4 fused disks.  i was on clonazepam for many years for sleep and it stopped working.  my de. switched me to lorazepam and i haven't slept for a week!  it is definitely not working for me for sleep.
151: Helps tremendously in regards to my anxiety & panic attacks.
152: The new Teva brand does not work. Teva bought Actavis and kept making the Actavis Watson tablets for years. Now they are doing in-house production, and the tablets don't work. The other generics on the market seem to be bad as well. Mylan and Qualitest worked. The ones left do not seem to. Actavis Watson was good.
153: It helps!
154: This drug will cause your hair to thin out and getting off the drug is very difficult. I have stopped several times and my Dr keeps perscribing more for trouble sleeping. My recommendation is not to take it.
155: I'm writing this for a family member who is on liquid lorazepam for Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD).  Dr. prescribed to reduce the anxiety associated with shortness of breath.  It has worked well for that, but with a nasty side effect.  Family member has gone from mentally sharp, aware and engaged to confused, forgetful and mentally sluggish.  Be careful.
156: As I am weaning off of Lexapro, I find my anxiety has risen.  I have 3 sleep disorders, so sleep is a challenge in the best times.  Now, I find I am regularly up until 5 or 6 am tossing and turning without the medication. 10 mg Taken 2-3 hours before bed usually allows me to stay asleep when I finally fall asleep.  I also wake up slowly, but that could just be my reaction.
157: I took this medication for 5 years because of my job that was very stressful.I had body jerks when trying to fall asleep.I took only once at bedtime and it was a great help.I have now retired and have stop taking it with no withdrawal symtoms.
158: I only take .25mg of this when needed (I cut the pill in half per dr instruction). It makes me feel kind of stoned for a couple house when I take it but definately calms me down. Don't really have any other side effects.
159: Childhood anxiety to now Md now I’m 50. Took several natural supplements and even Xanax about 12 years ago. Then one day recently had a AFIB attack doe to dehydration a heat exhaustion at work. Heart racing 188 and nothing helped. Not even this message. But after four hours on the ER and IVs of whatever it finally went back to normal and no need for heart restarting meds????. Anyway, after doctor asked about my anxiety and what I was taking he said well you need to treat that and the panic attacks. It’s apart of you’re quality of life. I had hurt suffered through before so anyway he put me in this lorazepam as needed. Wow it worked instantly. So when I get anxiety I take I quarter of 1 mg and heart slows down nerves calm I mean it’s fast acting. I don’t take pills just for my GERD, and anxiety meds no thanks but his works great. ??????Read More Read Less
160: I use the product at night when I have trouble sleeping.  Usually one will let me relax enough to go to sleep, sometimes it takes 2.  I use it 1 to 3 times a week.
161: In the morning I am foggy and I have stomach pains most of the day
162: The other reviewers are correct. This Leading Pharma brand is fraudulent.
163: Has anyone been satisfied with lorazepam made by Leading Pharma? I’ve read some bad reviews of it on the internet but I cannot believe it doesn’t work for everyone. My pharmacist recently started carrying ONLY Leading Pharma lorazepam....so after years of taking Watson made lorazepam I’m getting a bit concerned. Any positive reviews of Leading Pharma lorazepam would be very helpful.
164: Nobody should take it more then 4 weeks!i see people been taking it for years here,and giving it 5 stars!if it is so effective,how come you still using it?should it threat the problem by now?or you simply addicted?
165: I am somewhat pleased with this medication.  It does relieve anxiety and helps me sleep at which I have trouble with both.  However, if you don't spaace out your dosages (example, 1mg every two to three days)and take it every night for more than four weeks, when you try not taking it for a night, you will have troulbe falling asleep, at least I do.  It is now 3:10am and have to be to work by 8:00am and am up looking at these reviews to see if my symtoms are common.  From what I have read so far, it seems that most people when they try to stop taking Lorazepam, have a hard time going to sleep.  Scary, for me, when I can't sleep, the anxiety attacks occur.  I have tried many sleep aids but none tried so far work as well as this med but, it comes with a price.Read More Read Less
166: This is great for helping me fall asleep.However, I am trying to stop taking it.It is hard to do. I find it difficult to fall asleep without. I take 1mg at bedtime. If anyone knows of a way to ween yourself off please let me know.Denise.Driver2TN.GOV
167: I AM AFRAID THERE IS A INERT INGREDIENT IN SANDOZ GENERIC CAUSING SEVERE ABDOMINAL PAIN.  I HAVE AN EXTREME ALLERGY TO ASPARTAME AND IBUPROFEN ETC, ETC.  THE PHARMACY SAID I WILL HAVE A HARD TIME FINDING OUT WHAT ALL IS IN MY MEDICATIONS.
168: I feel like I can partially let go of my anxiety. I can definitely feel that anxiety hanging on. Not a fan of this medicine for my anxiety/seep problems.
169: I 've tried this medicine for a short time, then i was put on Lexapro(10mg) and Wellbutrion(150 mg). The result was much better, I have less voices and no paranoidal  thoughts
170: Went on this drug for moderate anxiety and chronic trouble sleeping. For those who understand how debilitating anxiety and insomnia are, you will find the calming effects of this drug a welcome relief. Works miracles on relieving anxiety and helping to fall asleep. Only downside is that if I stop taking it even for one night, I sleep very lightly, have lots of dreams, and wake up often.  I recommend only taking it at night if possible, because it does cause drowsiness and mild dizziness.
171: just quick note took this for depression seems to do ok, this is currently the only depression drug left in my system I had to go off all others because my symptoms were so severe I was reduced to a many seizures and memory loss problems. still having some memory problems so after reading this sights reviews i may need to kick this one out of my system TOO! I think I forgot to take it last night and I hardly slept!! To those of you sturggling with depression and other illnesses requiring use of Pysch meds DO NOT GIVE UP HOPE!!! NO YOU DON"T HAVE TO FEEL BAD FOREVER!!!! DO YOUR OWN WEB RESEARCH, TALK TO YOUR DOCTORS, KNOW WHAT YOUR MEDS ARE, CHECK OUT CELEBRATE RECOVERY AND MAKE YOUR DOCTORS LISTEN TO YOU AND HELP YOU UNTILL YOU DO FEEL BETTER!!!!!!!!!!! yes i am going to continue to take this until I see my dr. again for a follow up.Read More Read Less
172: I had sufferd for many, many years (since I was a kid) with GAD and PTSD. As soon as I began taking this medication, my symptoms lessend and I felt like I could get a "hold" on the panic...it doesn't go away, but I am less scared. My dosage is small, and I have never had to increase.  Usually one at night (much less frequent nightmares) and one mid-day if needed at all. I am not sure why there is such a stigma with this medication, but it has helped me and I am thankful.
173: Knocked me out cold, and woke up with what can only be described as a nasty hangover. Pounding headache, nausea, muscle aches, dizzyness, etc. DO NOT TAKE THIS DRUG. A small dose of Seraquel or Citalopram will put you to sleep w/o the nastyness.
174: I'm not sure what your definition of anxious is, but if it means anything like "panic attacks" Which is a problem i have. I give this medication 5 stars all the way around.   I'm a combat vet. I was driving down the road one day feeling fine when out of the blue I felt like i was having a heart attack.I stop at a near by fire station and they say all my vitals are fine. better than fine even. after several more of these incidents the VA says i'm having panic attacks. and prescribes me lorazepam as needed. It worked from get go. And it works within minutes for me. it's helped me allot over the last 6-7 years. Anybody with panic attacks that feel like heart attack (all the exact same symptoms of a heart attack)this medication may help you out.   Read More Read Less
175: My elderly mother is totally addicted to this stuff and can not stop because the withdrawl symptoms are so severe.  She has hallucinations, trouble walking, memory loss, confusion and paranoia. They told me she had dementia now I know she has a lorazapam addiction.  This is a serious drug and people should be warned.
176: I have been taking this drug for 4yr's with no side effects it helps me sleep too I take 0.5mg when needed.
177: This was administered due to seizures. It was very effective.  Only needed to use this one time sublingually. However I have been epileptic for a few years.
178: I have a hard time shutting my mind off at night, so my dr prescribed this instead of sleeping pills.  I take one .05 tablet before bed, and nine out of ten times it relaxes me so that I can fall asleep.  If I'm having a really bad night, I take a second tablet, but that's rare.  I only take it when I have to get up early the next day, though, never on weekends.  It's been a lifesaver for me.
179: I use this medication as part of my treatment for major depression. I have been using it for six years and have not had any problems with side effects.
180: This happens every single time I take the drug, the day after, I do not remember much
181: This was incorrectly prescribed for me. Caused me to walk bent forward and with my feet in a hurried pace but that couldn't keep up with my forward bent body and caused a horrific injurious fall. Would never take it again.
182: OKay this is not enough space to tell my experince with this drug.Take 2 times a day  am/pm for a  3 of differnt things. just don`t take to close to sleeping pill temazepam. Runied marriage,now separated after 21 years. wrecked 5 cars, caused all kinds of manic episodes and a great deal of memory loss,but all in all if I wasn`t takin it I would probly be dead. So i think I can truly say it has worked for me.  It really does calm me down,helped me quit smoking after 15 years.helped me over come the intense loss of self confidence after 5  "total knee replacement" FALIARES. AND ALL THE REVISIONS.Which left me phyically crippled (mentally as well) and it goes on and on don`t let me make you feel like you need your dose know when it is not time.   Read More Read Less
183: I had sudden panic attack and my doctor and the Emergency room put me on this medication in addiction to an anti depressant. This medication works amazing and I can finally function again compared to a month ago when I was not even able to shower myself because I was scared to fall over or drive
184: I had post concussion syndrome
185: Controls my anxiety and relaxs me.
186: extremely additive when used more than a few weeks . then you have to increase after you build a tolerance. do not take this drug. I am stuck on it and not 1 doctor can get me off ot it
187: I was struggling with stress, constantly overwelmed with everything & all the littl things. lorazepam is a wonderful pill that takes the ruff edge off so I can be me again, and get back to handling those little stressers in my day.
188: how long does this stay in your system
189: really i can't tell that i'm on it is only 1mg
190: stops my bad dreams thereby allowing me to sleep 6 or 7 hrs.
191: extremely addictive, have stopped on my own several times, with resulting severe anxiety attacks within 24 to 36 hours.
192: letheragy most of next day,  depression
193: I was prescribed 0.5mg before bed. I didn’t feel anything and it hasn’t helped me asleep at all. currently i’m trying 2mg. so far haven’t been able to sleep still but am definitely feeling more relaxed. will update.
194: I'm going thru some serious personal problems.  My doctor prescribed Lorazepam 0.5 mg. It totally eliminates my stress and I can function normally and feel no side effects.  I take 1-4 tab a day or as needed for stress.
195: Have been taking Xanax for severe menstrual mood swings & occasional anxiety. Yesterday, my Dr. told me she wants to switch me to Ativan since it's not addicting??? From what I've read, it's just as addicting as Xanax, so not sure what to think. Any thoughts would be greatly appreciated :)
196: After about a week of taking it daily, it caused uncontrollable shaking in all musles in my body, which lasted for 4 days after I discontinued use. It also made me very tired during the day, and caused severe dry mouth. The benefits certainly didn't outweigh the risks.
197: It help me take the edge off my anxious nerves and I was able to see clearly what I must do to ease the tension.
198: it makes me tired all the time
199: It makes me very, very calm  and sleepy.
200: It gave me hives anybody else have this problem?
201: I have been taking Lorazapam for 15 years for my Multiple Sclerosis have great results no M.S. problems
202: I have been on this drug on and off for over 10 years. I take it when needed. It takes only a small amount of time to take the edge off. It has made my life more easy.
203: Works well during the day, gives me bad dreams if I take it too close to bedtime.
204: My lips go numb.  Brain in Anartica, freeze dry.    I had no problem with Actives Phara., but Leading Pharma version had an immediate bad effect.  They need to be checked for their quality.
205: very relaxing
206: insomnia
207: I have been taking 2MG every night for sleep for the past5 months. Works great.  Concerned about what I have heard about memory loss. Could there be a connection to high blood pressure?
208: stopped MILD panic attacks. Reduced a Quivering feeling. Slept better
209: This drug effectively reduces anxiety (works quickly in less than 30 minutes) and produces a calming effect that allows one to realize the anxiety can go away and one can function "normally".  It also helps calm one down to fall asleep, when anxiety is the cause for sleep disorder.
210: I am really happy with this drug, i was prescribed it for anxiety and panic attacks, I was nearly to the point where i would sit in my car before school ( i was a senior in high school) and sweat, vomit and panic about all the "what-ifs".  Between this and regular Psychotherapy, I feel that I really have a handle on my life for the first time.  Just watch out though... I used it nearly six days a week for an entire school year and went through some withdrawal insomnia.  It was prescribed to me "as needed" but watch out, regular use seems to lead to withdrawal issues sometimes.  Read More Read Less
211: I took this medicine for 7 years--with increasing dosages.  Ended up in the psych hospital to detox off of it.  It was helpful for anxiety and sleep, but with what cost?
212: I take this right before i have a panic attake since i have panic disorder and it works very well! i get just a bit tired but i think thats from being drained by dehydration. its very calming!
213: i love this medication i have gone threw numerous trials of other meds and this is the only one that calms my anxiety and cuts off a panic attack. i heard it can be addicting but i usually only take it when i have panis attacks now. it makes me super calm happy and sleepy =]
214: Lorazepam has been a true God-send to me for decades, as well as my mother, also for decades.  It's often the ONLY thing that helps me sleep at night... without it, I can literally not sleep until 2am-3am.  It's also excellent for heightened anxiety, calming the jitters and "clenched" muscle feelings.
215: I am a new user of this perscription. Started out using .05mg 2x day, no notice of it helping. Followed up w/Dr. following month, increased dose to 1 mg. 2 x daily as needed.  QUESTION: Went outta town and left w/o script and off it for 3 days, and woke up the third morning and half my dang head/ear was NUMB!!! Anyone else get this if forgotten to take? Or your side effects. Not sure if this is normal, was on schedule till that dang weekend. lol.... All in all it was working, not a big pill taker here. Any advice from current takers please would be greatly appriciated.Read More Read Less
216: I have been on this medication since 2011 when I had colon cancer and chemo, my anxiety level was high I couldn't sleep at night This medication worked very well for me 1.5mg once b4 bed under the tonge. Now it's 2019 my doctors have whined me off of it saying it's not good for my bones, brain ect. Its been over a month not takeing it I still don't sleep right and they won't put me back on it so I guess i'm screwed
217: I have been taking .5mg for several years now and it works great.  Only take it as needed but definitely helps with the severe anxiety I experience.
218: I have suffered from tension headaches for 3yrs and this seems to be the only medicine that has worked for me. I take 1mg tabs 3 times a day. My body has adjusted to the dose so I do not have drowsiness or any bad symptoms.  I have tried to live without the medication but my headaches are disabling so it has given me my life back again.  I know the risks of taking this medication but when I had to choose between quality of life and being a hermit, I chose the medication. I hope this helps anyone that sufffers from tension headaches like myself.Read More Read Less
219: Off an on over the past 10 years I experience acute anxiety (usually lasts a week or so), mostly work-related.  Lorazepam has been a life saver.  0.5mg dose takes the edge off and allows me to function normally.  I've never had any problem stopping using it, and noticed no negative side effects.
220: As with all Drugs the effectiveness starts with the user. If your a heavy user with multiple types of drugs for the same problems (I.E. taking with Paxil etc.) you're not really gonna know how effective it is. If your not mixing it with other things it works much better.
221: Fine expect after 7 years of taking 1/2 mil. a few days a week the withdrawal symptoms of dizziness, confusion, blurred vision continue now 4 weeks after stopping use
222: I started taking Lorazepam for anxiety after the death of a child.  I take 1 tablet every 6 hours.  It has helped me.
223: It take it for episodic panic attacks and general bouts of anxiety. It seems particularly valuable in situations where my anxiousness is so great that I am unable to concentrate at work. It calms me considerably thus allowing me to be more productive.    However there is a trade off. My mental acuity is not as sharp and it gives me the feeling of being slightly intoxicated. Not surprisingly it lowers my energy level and makes me feel slightly sleepy. Yet still a good trade off versus a panic freeze that makes me completely dysfunctional. Also I've discover that it is best to use the smallest dose possible that will still allow me to derive the benefit without experiencing the hazy side effects. I often break the one milligram pill in half or even quarters.     I try never to use it more than 2 days in a row for fear of addiction.    I also use it at night for insomnia that results from racing mind syndrome. Used in conjunction with ambien, I never fails to get me to sleep and usually sleep 8 hours or more. (Wouldn't suggest this for those who have any side effects with ambien). I do have a slight hang over effect from the lorazepam which makes it hard to hit the ground running in the morning, but not as bad as the hangover you get from a night of drinking.     Overall, I've had a good experience... and it certainly has saved many a day I would have otherwise just been pacing the floor... wringing my hands over an anxiety attack
224: i just starting taking this medicine and was wondering more about it.
225: My doctor gave me this as an alternative to valium for anxiety and muscle spasms with a broken hand. I don't feel it has the effectiveness of the generic valium.  Both drugs were given at the lowest dosage.
226: It is very mild to me when i use it, i used for aniety and sleep. It works on those two syptoms. I would reccommend this to someone due to the fact that it is so mild that you don't experience a high effect just a calm repond.
227: I found this relaxes me and my anxity
228: taken for pre dental surgery and it helped with anxiety a great deal
229: I've been having very severe panic and anxiety attacks for the past four years after being alive for 60. I came out of the blue when I was 56, scared the crap out of me. My vitals are perfect, CT scan, blood work all normal....Blood Pressure got up to 168/103 when this panic attack came on. Drove my self to the clinic, another panic attack. Took lorazepam and felt perfect. Not groggy, light headed, nothing. After so many years I finally found something. Not a big on pills, but it seemed nothing helps. Hopefully when I retire the stress will decrease.

Wishing you all with this disease of panic and anxiety the best, it's the fighter fight. Just don't give up. Mind over matter.Read More Read Less
230: I would not reccomend this drug for people suffering from alcohol withdrawls.It helped a lot when I took it but when I didn't it increased anxiety and now my arms and legs are numb. I would go with natural vitamins. I am a caregiver also and this drug can either be very good for the elderly or have terrible withdrawls.Everyone reacts different to everything,this iswn't right for me.
231: i haad a panic attack at age 58 first in my life about 2 mon. ago
232: I was prescibed 1mg for my anxiety and sleep problems. The pills do not put me to sleep, they don't even make me drowsy or slow me down. I'm starting to wonder if I was given a placebo.  Is it just me or are there others who have this problem?
233: can not sleep without it
234: little dizzyness
235: My current antidepressant isn't working, so I'm seeing my doc this Friday to get it changed. I continue to have anxiety and constant worry. I plan to take 2 pills a day for the next five days just to relieve the symptoms so I can somewhat function at work until my dr. appt.  Yes, the pill is addictive because when I weaned myself off of them, I started having anxiety attacks, and my asthma symptoms came back.  I tried to not touch the bottle of pills, but finally resorted to it because I would have fainted or lost it if I didn't have them.  I'm hoping that by changing my antidepressent med that it will help and I will no longer be dependent on Lorazepam.  But it really does work to calm the nerves, get some sleep and deal with stress and less worry.  Read More Read Less
236: IT SEEMS TO BE HELPING ME.  NOT ON IT VERY LONG BUT WAKE UP IN A BETTER MOOD THAN I USE TO.
237: nice calming effect and ends the jitters of nervousness
238: I have Multiple Sclerosis and one of the Key Factors to staying in a remitent state is to maintain my stress level.. I've been on this medication for about 4 years now and to me, it's a Godsend !! I've taken Klonopin and Xanex, both of which made me feel goofy, Ativan doesn't do that to me, it simply mellows me out and that's exactly what I'm looking for !! Very good med in my opinion !!
239: took a 2mg pill each night for 4 nights. felt absolutely nothing. it was like I never took the pill.
240: I have been satisfied with my experience of the drug...
241: It has allowed me to sleep soundly without the intermittent awakenings, mightmares, cold sweats and morning fatigue.
242: This drug has been extremely helpful with my anxiety issues and only .5 mg helps me get a good night's sleep with no side effects other than feeling calm. It is quick acting for me yet doesn't linger in my system longer than I want it to.  Also no problem with withdrawal symptoms upon stopping it.
243: counteract loss of spouse
244: This medicine is like taking a placebo. My brother has the same problem with one of his meds from this manufacturer too! It's junk.
245: I had a high case of anxiety and could not sleep well. When I started on 1 mg. it worked well for me I'm now down to 1 pill a day at night and I'm sleeping well. I have been on this for about 4 months now.
246: For some reason, it helps muscle and joint pain of fibromyalgia and art5hritis
247: works great for me,, tried Valium but it gave me hang overs, Lorazepam or Ativan is good
248: I take this in conjunction with lexapro. I only use lorazepam as needed for panic attacks. It takes a full 2 hours to work, but it has never failed to reduce the symptoms of anxiety. Do not take with sleeping pills, alcohol, or NSAIDs. Read all drug interactions before taking any medication. Do not depend on your doctor to tell you everything.
249: The first day I took it, I was surprised by how quickly I returned to feeling calm and my normal.  The first night I was amazed by how quickly it helped stop all the thoughts running through my head, got me mentally quiet, and right to sleep.  I woke up with less than 8 hours of sleep and felt refreshed -  no grogginess.  It  has made a huge difference just getting me back to zero.
250: I started this drug for difficulty falling asleep that came on with menopause. Worked great-no side effects. With sleep I am perfect during the day. But my Dr. will only prescribe it along with an antidepressant, so now on zoloft too-side effects-weight gain/sexual-Ugh...not happy about that. Benzos like ativan are addicting though and she wants me to eventually ween off the ativan and stay on the zoloft only. I tried this last year and couldnt just get off the ativan, so I weened off both slowly after a year with no problems...had 8 months med free...5 good months then 3 struggling...and now the need to start all over. Now have to try to come off it again and stay on the zoloft. I take one .5 at 5pm and two .5 at 9pm. Slept thru the night for the first time in a very long time. Tonight I will stop the 5 pm one as I want to keep the dose as low as possible. On zololt 25mg now...going up to 50 next week per Drs orders, but I'd like to stay at 25 and just might.  Read More Read Less
251: i was diagnosed for pts in 1994 after some things that happened to me and this drug has eased my anxieties...img three times a day help me out alot..
252: This has worked for me for over ten years, lowest dosage- one before bed.  I never use this for any other reason than sleep.  It was prescribed by physician after my husband died, for sleep.  I would never over use this med.  It can be a real problem, from what I hear.
253: Didn't realize that this drug also helped with psoriasis. When I started taking Lorazepam, my psoriasis started disappearing. Another plus
254: MAKES ME HATEFUL
255: I am a sleep walker. Funny till I fell & got concussion. Helps me stay in bed when sleeping
256: I took it only one time due to concern about dependence. I slept for 6 hours for the first time in about 4 years!
257: stops anxiety.
258: 1mg tablets, two times a day, really helped a stress basket like myself out alot.
259: I have been on a 3-year nightmare with this crap.  And I would like to call it MUCH  worse,if not for decency's sake here.  MY worthless doctor COULD have prescribed or recommended many other choices, say melatonin, but as happens in his scurried world, just gave me a "pill" for the insomnia, albeit brought on by life trama. My cognitive albilities, memory, and living in a constant state of derealization (out of body) and depersonalization (no feelings..) should be some warning for others to STAY away from the benzo's.  ALL of them.  Near-impossible to get off, extremely addicitve.Read More Read Less
260: Ingredients
261: Dr perscribed for me 2mg 3 times per week for sleep. I was not sleeping the other 4 nights, so it was changed to every night if needed.It has been a life saver for me.I was so exhausted all the time before taking this, and had tried many other RX in the antidepressent family. This works.
262: Had anxiety & panic attacks daily since Covid a few years ago. Doctors have tried everything & the ssi's were making me nauseous & diarrhea, felt very sick however lorazepam has helped me with coping during the day/night.
263: not working good
264: Have been taking this for 18 months. Fantastic at relieving axiety! It's a great sleep aid and has less side affects than most of the prescribed aids. I take it once every 2 or 3 nights. I cannot think of any side affects I have had. I take it an hour before bedtime and I sleep 8 hours. Great med!
265: It worked great for the time I needed it, HIGHLY ADDICTIVE, horrible to come off from even over a 4 week period. I will never, ever take this again. I was on the lowest dosage and was in a fog most of the time. This drug scared me.
266: I take two mg at bedtime. Sleep like a baby for 8 hours. No hangover. I have tried everything for sleep and anxious. This one dose helps me throughout the day. Great drug.
267: small amount of loss of balance.
268: control anxiety
269: I suffer from anxiety attacks out of the blue.  All of a sudden they are there brought on by nothing in general.. I use 1 mg tablet of this product and start deap breathing exercises and it knocks out my anxiiety.  I feel very fortunate to have this available to me and the doctor that prescribed it nad diagnosed my problem.
270: Have taken this for approx 3 yr, 2mg-3times daily, have not had to increase, but always need this amount, no help with sleeping- but stops the anxiety, slows my racing thoughts, and worry over nothing!  Will most likely have to go off if more is required, and take something else, but has worked longer than any other I have taken, and have tried many.  Have to take 5 mg of Diazpam maybe once or twice a week when I am just so nervous I feel trembly-Typa A personality, and cannot slow down, anxious constantly if not taking somethin, then become depressed. I still have to take something to sleep. I have to stay up and read , go to gym to workout to make myself tired enough to sleep through a night and never get 8 hours-have never slept my entire life.  Would have been ADHD most likely as a child, taught 30 years-wish I had had some help as a child, would have made huge difference in my life!I posted under ativan as wellRead More Read Less
271: Friend being treated with Prozac in combination with this drug has become addicted. Now takes a sixty day prescription in two to three weeks. I am very concerned. When this friend runs out she buys Xanax from drug dealers. I don't know what to do to help her.
272: I have slept better since using this RX. I still wake up two or more times a night but I'll usually fall back asleep quickly. When I don't take this RX at all to see if I can sleep on my own, I have trouble. It always turns out the same way. When it's time to go to bed I'm never sleepy and when I finally decide to just go to bed I'll toss and turn all night and maybe get three to four hours of sleep.Taking the RX has helped me to sleep better then if not taking anything.
273: it basically helped me sleep. and increased my sex drive
274: I was first given Vyvanse to my ADHD - but after a few years I was having more anxiety. I also had a lot going on in my life. I was prescribed Lorazepam ..5 mg to be used twice or day or as I felt I needed it. It worked a little but now I'm up to 2mg twice a day. I like to take one to go to bed at night as sometimes i can't turn off my brain and fall asleep. I like to take the other during the day while working which helps control my anxiety in dealing with people and projects. I may have the doctor walk back the dose to 1mg as I think I'd function better. my side effects are constipation, doesn't like alcohol, drowsiness. feeling of fullness
275: Been taking 25mg twice/day for 6 weeks. Helps when I feel anxious but then I get really tired. Seems like I get nervous feeling if I don't take it every day. Doc said can't take for more than 4 mos. I tried Zoloft and had every side effect, stopped taking it after 2 weeks. Any ideas that is similar to Lorazepam?? At least I feel "normal" besides the tiredness towards he evening hours.
276: took this for 1 and 1/2 years, no one told me it might increase my anxiety, it did , now I am trying to stop taking it and it is HELL. Never in my life have I felt this bad, I lowered the doses but are having terrible withdrawal symptems, I do not reccommend this to anyone and I wish I had never started taking this. I feel like a junkie.  I tried to find out how long it would take for it to come out of my system, 3days to three months I have been told by more than one MD or Nurse.  I suggest to people not to do it alone, seek medical and Psychiatric helpRead More Read Less
277: This is a very good medication for anxiety, insomnia, seizures!
278: I use this drug to prevent seizures.  I can usually feel when I am going to have a seizure.  Lorazapam helps me to prevent seizures, which is extremely helpful. I just take 1mg when I get the feeling of a seizure.
279: I agree totally with one other persons experience with this drug. Don't start taking it in the first place. I started tkaing it to stop drinking. Well I still drink and have been taking the grug for four years now. I don't drink as much for what's worth. The drug also in the morning has my thought patterns just flying by I cannot just think one thought at a time other thoughts just keep coming in at will. I should have just hung on tight for some day's and sweated the alcohol out of me and hit AA.Read More Read Less
280: This drug sucks. I was put on this drug and i took it with out any other medicine. My side effects are what scared me. I started to black out, shake and loose memory which resulted in other serious problems. I highly recommend to tell your doctor to prescribe you something else.
281: This was prescribed for me because I fall asleep well but have a difficult time staying asleep. When I wake I can not fall back to sleep because I can not shut my brain off. This drug helps most of the time but not as well during hormonal periods. I do not use it every night.
282: It works great for me! I finally found something to clear my mind when I can't sleep and relax. I have been taking this medication since Feb 2011 and I only use it as needed, I can't say I'm addicted since I use it around 3-4 times a month and I have no side effects.
283: I have been prescribed this medication to take one every 4 hours during the day.  As a recent widow, my anxiety is mostly experienced at bedtime. I am taking 2 mg Estazolam for sleep and I also take 1 mg of Lorazepam.  I find it to be very effective "IF" I take it about 30 minutes before time on an empty stomach.
284: I HAD TO GO TO A DRUG REHAB CENTER TO DETOX FROM THIS!! VERY DANGEROUS DRUG AND HORRIBLE TO COME OFF OF!  DON'T TAKE IT! Yeah...it helped with anxiety, but over time I became so tolerant of it, it didn't work anymore.  Very addicting.  Also, after I detoxed, I realized how much of a fog it put me in.  It made me very depressed once I hit the max dosage.
285: My mind doesn't shut off. I've been taking 4mg for a year.Fell I could use more. I still don't sleep solid,but DRs. are not tring anything else!
286: I have been using this med for about 5 years.  I take (1) 1mg per day.  It was prescribed for post tramatic stress syndrome.  It helps me to stay calm and collect.  It also has helped with sleep.  I have had to cut back, (1) 1mg ever other day, due to the effectivness.  I take it at bedtime and (.05mg) on overwelming days.  I will take for the rest of my life the benefits DO out way the downfalls.
287: this bill is better then lexapro, but dontover does your self with loazpam, its a nacotic drug
288: I take this 2 times a day with no side effects and it works great.
289: very effective for severe anxiety attacks with no side effects.  works very fast if put under tongue.  1mg dose seems quite enough.  I only take it as needed in a severe attack.
290: very helpful and as of now no sideeffects
291: I use lorazepam along with Paxil (paroxetine) and lorazepam is extremely helpful for me for both anxiety and falling asleep.
292: Very pleased with this medication, I have changed my Dr as my 1st one wouldn't have any thing 2 do with it, due 2 my severe stress of losing my father due 2 a heart attack when I was only 18, I now have another Dr who has no problem giving me this when I need it, works well, this other Dr worked for himself not for his patient & had it all in theory & no experience (NOT GNG BACK TO HIM)
293: I began this drug 2 1/2 years ago.  I take 1mg daily.  I have an optic nerve condition that causes my vision to go crazy.  Everything will go purple, or everything I see is wavy.  I even have bouts of complete blindness.  It's been hard to not panic and this drug has helped with calming me down and slowing my heart rate.  I would panic and pass out and that rarely happens anymore.  It is very addictive and I sometimes find myself running out before I'm able to get it refilled.  If used properly, very effective.  Be careful to not get the mentality that if one works so well, two would be even better.  But the good definitely outweighs the bad
294: Had horrid thoughts/depression/anxiety & panic attacks. Still have them here & there however this medication saved my life.
295: reviewing to see if it may work for me
296: I suffer from Anxiety and PTSD.  I have been taking this medication for three years now.  I find that it is better for me when I use it only AS NEEDED.  Medication can make you dependent...
297: it worked very well for me
298: I can relax within 15 minutes after taking meds.
299: I am being treated for cancer. I have Multiple Myeloma. My chemo requires me to take a significant dose of steroids at each treatment. It is considered part of my Chemotherapy and cannot be lowered in dose or frequency. After my 2nd cycle of chemo, I began to experience "roid rage." At first I laughed it off and was like "OMG! This is a real thing!" The humor wore off quickly as this rage became down right dangerous and completely uncontrollable. I at the urging of the bone marrow transplant team's Psychiatrist, I started taking 5 mg of lorazepam the morning of my chemo, and in the evening after it, and then twice a day for 48 hrs  I cannot express the relief that I and my family feel now. Our safety was a real concern, let alone fighting a deadly cancer. This medication simply removed the rage associated with Dexamethasone. It put me and everyone around me at ease, and is making us far more ready for the bone marrow transplant.Read More Read Less
300: My 82 year-old mother as been on 1mg three times a day for years. If she is late taking her dose she starts having shakes.  Because of the length of time she has been taking this drug, the doctors feel it would take 6-months in the hospital to get her off. If she were to try cold-turkey, she would have heart failure.
301: I need to know if it is a narcotic
302: I have COPD & Asthma when I can't breath I go into a panic. and I am Anxious all the time when I take it it helps so much. I take 0.5mg every 6hrs as needed
303: I suffered from extreme jaw pain and muscle pain in my face, head and shoulders. Vicodin and codeine didn't even touch the pain and suffering that accompanied the condition. My doctor had me take Lorazepam which allowed me to relax both my jaw and the muscles. After about 3 days of using 1mg tablets every 12 hours the pain and tension in my jaw disappeared. Although it wasn't given to me with the intention of helping my stress and O.C.D. symptoms, it did. I'm pretty familiar with similar drugs like xanax and diazepam (Valium) and have taken them in the past but Lorazepam has worked for me better than the above mentioned. Thanks Doc.Read More Read Less
304: Lorazepam made by this company doesn't seem to be effective Other generic branfs much more effective
305: Starting taking this drug 2 years ago in conjunction with antidepressant, Ambien and multiple pain meds to treat severe fibromyalgia pain, anxiety & sleeplessness.  I take this before bed to calm down enough to let the Ambien work. I am off the pain meds but may never be off the rest.  I tried to go off lorazepem once and suffered panic attacks.  I have developed a tolerance for this and may have to ask for a higher dosage (now at 1 mg an hr before bed & another 1 mg with the Ambien).  I would prefer to be pill free but this drug has been a life-saver.  At one point, I thought I would be disabled and I am still working.  Don't take this for more than a few weeks if you don't have to but if you have to, it can make a big difference in how you function or whether or not you function.  You may have to accept that it is a permanent part of your life if on long-term.Read More Read Less
306: I enjoy taking this drug because I find it is very calming. I am prescribed an anxiety medication, a depression medication, both of which I take daily and if those dont seem to kick in I take a lorazapam. I only take it as needed once or twice a week usually& it works just fine. I was a little scared of becoming dependant on the drug because of family addiction history but ive been taking it as needed for about 10 months now and im perfectly find and lead a happy normal life on this drug. Side effects tho are a almost high feeling, which i get sometimes but it usually wears off in like an hour, I slur my words sometimes and just act a lttle funky  but my anxiety is so bad that the symptoms override my need for lorazapam.Read More Read Less
307: DOES NOT PRODUCE SLEEP TO OFTEN
308: I have been over all satisfied with this treatment. However, my concern is what happens if I quit taking it?
309: Not helping more depressed
310: It helps me sleep, has reduced anxiety some.  Have experienced a few side effects.
311: I have acute alcoholism. Thankfully, I have proceeded through detox and all withdrawal symptoms. Lorazepam has been very beneficial in my treatment by curbing my desires to drink and has given me most gratifying sleep that i have so sought for many years. Lorazepam has put balance in my life, and has removed the fear of my unknown future, replaced by reassured hope.
312: I have been using 1mg every 6 hours since 1985 for fibromialgia and anxiety. It has worked well and kept me functioning all these years. I was put on this at Ochners Clinic in New Orleans. My present Dr. says I am doing better than any of his other fibro patients and does not want me to change to anything else. I also take 50mg of Loudiomil at bedtime to help me sleep. These have been a lifesaver for me. I know i am addicted to this medicine but the fibro pain is unbearable without it. I take very little pain medication. I am 65 years old now and play 18 holes of golf several times a week. I saw recently they were experimenting with ativan for fibro treatment. I can tell you factually that it works and I owe my life to the Drs. at Ochners who were years ahead of other Centers in the treatment of Fibromialgia.Read More Read Less
313: was very helpful to my wellbeing and inner peace.
314: i was having anxiety attacks and do not get them anymore since i been using lorazepam.i will usually take 1 or sometimes 2 before bed
315: I have trouble sleeping due to a severe back problem. This drug is most helpful to get me to relax & sleep.
316: i been on taking tihs for 2 year ans its dose help when is gets workt up I HAVE SHINTGLES AS WELL ANS SOMEDAY I NEED SA LITTLE SLOW DOWN IN MY LIFES ANS ME DOCTOR SYAS THIS IS OK FOR SOMEONE MY AGE.  I AM 78 YARS OLD ANS I GET AROUND SO IT I HELPS.
317: It has given me control of my anxious feelings when I take the pill
318: I take this medication as a rescue medication for seizures to break cluster seizures.
319: HOW LONG DOES 1 LORAZAPAM 1MG STAY IN YOUR SYSTEM?
320: I got this for panic attacks and stress and it worked GREAT. I read side effects posted here by others. I had those experiences with Zanax and similar drugs but not this. So apparently the slight chemical differences affect people differently. Try a different member of same family if you have problems w/ this. I sleep great and do have a little dingy time in am so I take it at night. I haven't tried to quit yet so don't know if I will have problems. But I could live on this stuff for rest of life and definately be happy.Read More Read Less
321: I have fought depression and anxiety for almost 20 years,  the better years were when on Effexor for about 8 yrs till it dwindled in it effectiveness and I lost insurance.  So for the past 3 1/2 yes I have had no Insurance and no medicine.  I felt i could fight the anxiety and depression and win, be strong, however it has eaten me up and I have sadly been on  the absolute edge of survival since, hanging by a nats hair every day wondering at when my head would actually pop right off due to the extreeeeme tightness and tension I was experiencing 24/7.  I recently became inusured and have seeker treatment.  I have now been on Lorazapam for a few days only in addiion to Prestique.  The Lorasapam has saved my once desperate life, it has worked so well I can now absorb the great things and people around me and feel like I am calm and pleasant company.  I will be living my life now with complete appreciation rather than in a black hole of cutting edge pain
322: I recently lost my wife. she passed last summer and I have been having a tough time dealing with it. My Doctor realized my depression and prescribed lorazepam and I only take it when the depression increases.     I am only on my first refill, and each scip is only 20 pills with each refill( 0.5 mg ). It seems to work but I need to give it more time. The verdict is still out.
323: IT MAY MAKE ME TOO RELAXED.  I TAKE 3 A DAY  AND I FEEL "OUT OF IT"
324: Nothing has changed with the way my body works.  I'm still feeling very Depressed, I don't want to do anything, never did, and I feel like this is how I am going to be for the rest of my life.
325: Been taking this for 5 years.  Still does wonders for my anxiety.
326: Since my initial 2 week dosage, I am taking one 1mg pill at night and sleep about 6 hrs in a row which is better than I have slept for years. I haven't had to take any pills through the day until today when I let myself get anxious over work and family matters.
327: This drug did not help me at all. When I took it, it made my body feel like it was on fire and I was rushed to the emergency room. Diazapm is the way to go!!!
328: I have taken this med for over ten years 1mg x 3 a day you can build a tolerance but I would never take anymore than that I only take 1 a day for panic. It has saved my life.
329: Effective anti-anxiety med.  I have multiple health issues, and this was added to the 15 prescriptions I take daily.  Have taken it before (several years ago). Doc prescribed this, though I prefer some others -- but he's the professional, and this one is OK.
330: I was having major issues sleeping and dealing with anxiety. My therapist prescribed me Lorazepam before bed to help me fall asleep and rest. Before the medication, I would feel tired but not fall asleep. There was a point I went four nights without sleep and was miserably tired. Once using the medication I was able to fall and stay asleep. Days I forgot to take the meds I would not be able to fall asleep. I used this medication for a little over a year. My depression and anxiety improved and it's been 12 years since using the meds.Read More Read Less
331: a calming  feeling helps stomach issues      no hangover next  day
332: i have been on the med for a year now and i am completely addicted to it. if i try to wean my self off from it, the withdrawls are so severe and frightening that i have to get another pill. then the number of pills i have to take just to get over the withdrawls keep increasing. i'm too embarrased to speak to my doctor about it, so i just keep asking him for a new script every month and pray that he will, do not start on this med if you can help it
333: have lost a lot of weight I have no more emotions can,t even cry ,laugh just got so depress with this meds But I cant just stop taking them ,Im so afraid now I wasn't and I'm hook on them,If I TRY STOPPING I get sick,Iwish I NEVER STARTED TO TAKE THEM MY CHILDREN DON'T EVEN LIKE COMING OVER CAUSE I HAVE JUST DONT TALK LIKE I USED TOO .I WENT FROM 130lbs to 91 lbs this meds has stolen my life,I trusted the doctors as they continue to give it to me telling me it would work to give it time,that everything was in my head,and not realizing it was destoying my life.its not in my head,they are call side affects    Read More Read Less
334: I'm taking for insomnia due to anxiety. It helps me calm my mind so that I can sleep. I may take half tablet during the day for anxiety, if need. Slowly recovering from anxiety, taking lorazepam only as needed. I have a lot of nausea not sure if this drug is causing, because I'm taking other meds.
335: Although my main issue is depression, I also suffer from some anxiety.  My psychiatrist has had me taking these pills as needed for over a year now.  They come in handy whenever I’m feeling stressed, am about to go in a stressful situation, or feel anxious while trying to switch over depression medications.  It can make me feel calm, though not necessarily happy.  I find that it has less effect if I start taking it too often for too long, but overall it has been a helpful medicine.  I recommend taking it as needed whenever you feel yourself start getting anxious.  Don’t wait until you’re entirely bogged down in anxiety!Read More Read Less
336: My hands Swelled up & dowssy!
337: I've been on 1mg Twice a day for the past 3yrs. Worked wonders in the begining but now I don't feel it's as effective as it was in the begining. I wonder if my body is becoming immuned to it.
338: the veterans medical association buys the cheapest drugs out there and some name brands are not as strong as other's. So, I get a different brand each refill!
339: Treats anxiety quickly and effectivly.  Not needed for prolonged periods.  Take as needed.
340: ive been taking this medication on and off for years due to my anxiety it is the only drug that gets me that fast relief when in a panic attack, i used this 1mg 3x a day for six months than wass taken off. i went almost a full year before i had another anxiety attack im currently on .5 mg 3xs a day along with 25mg of zoloft and it seems the two together are helping greatly. i hope to be off this meds soon but i know its there if i need it in a bind..
341: This drug made me very drowsy. And caused problems with urinating . It never relieved my facial sweating which was a side effect of my anxiety. suzebarb I also experienced hair loss .
342: 0.5 mg at night. I was prescribed this for my anexiety with my CPAC machine for snoring. Did not realize how stressed out i was until I started taking this drug- works well- no side affects-sleep better and just fell better things do not bother me as they used to
343: I have been on this for 1 1/2 years it has been wonderful I am aware it is habbit forming so please be very careful. I usually take just .5 mil's 1 X a day and finding myself in need of a quick fix some days my Dr is watching closely and I am trying to get off this because I am finding out that it can cause liver damage and I routinely am going to the Dr's and having blood test done and all exams turn out normal I do drink light beer but only after about 10 hrs after I take the Rx I feel I should increse it but am affraid of the effects if I start taking more  so I stick with my pill cut in half early morning routine but still have panick attacks not as frequent as before i started this RX hope this helps take care all. Many people do not realize that GAD is a power beyond anyones control so DO NOT think you are alone or are crazy I just hope I can get off this soon I am in the process of weening where I put a tab in water and each week I dump out a lttle b4 I drink the water less and less each week.Read More Read Less
344: I was on .5 mg 1-3 per day for over 5 years.  I took this with Celexia & Trazadone which caused me to pass out and drive off a cliff.  My dr. discontinued these drugs all at once and I suffered severe withdrawal symtoms which at the time I did not know were Benzo withdrawals and I was diagnosed as Bi-polar II and put on Lamictal, Trazadone, Neurontin, Celexia, and Cymbalta all together which reacted with the previous lorazepam and put me into a coma.  This has been the most horrifying, painful experience I have ever been through with these drugs, and will never recommend them to anyone
345: all varieties of generic ativan are effective
346: Love this med. It helps with my RLS, and anxiety. Just wish it lasted longer. It puts me to sleep if I take 0.5mg or more. Low side effects, feel spacey but thats about it. I maybe on this for a long time, even though its not good or longterm use.
347: The medication is good but blurs my vision very badly. It also makes my dizzy so there are some pro and cons to this medication.
348: i get extreme anxiety and it calms me down to oh well its not a big deal afterall
349: Was given this for insomnia. At first took 1 pill .05 at dinnertime, then 2 pills .05 at bedtime. Woiked great. Dr. has me weaning off bec she is afraid of addiction/tolerance. I've been on for almost 4 months. Now down to 1 .05 at bedtime, after 5 nights it stopped working at that dose. I started getting anxiety bec I could not sleep and decided to take a Sonata sleeping pill (trying not to take sleeping pills..) Next night, I went back to 2 pills .05 Lorazepam which always worked and it did not! I took another Sonata just to get to sleep. Now I am thinking after 4 months, my body is intolerant to my cutting down on the dose. I think its time to get off. I hear its very hard to quit. Try not to up the dose, once your body tells you it needs to up the dose, its time to get off, unless you do not care about its addicting qualities.Read More Read Less
350: My daughter was put on this after a horrible disease took over her body suddenly (Gillian-Barre' syndrome) and attacked her nerves and muscles. She coped much much better after they put her on this. It was a life saver! I would recommend it in such extreme cases to anyone. She would not have been able to sleep or function with out it. It was a true life savor! She only took it for a few weeks and it was a miricle! Her nurses I am sure would agree!
351: still not getting a good sleep
352: I took this drug for two weeks. In that time period I lost my memory. It was the worst experience I have ever had. Not remembering when I took my pill caused me to overdose. Had lots of side effects. I would recommend a different drug for anxiety like zanax.
353: It really calms me down and helps me sleep but I am wondering if any one has experienced hair loss with this drug? i have read on here and talked to my pharmacists and haven't been able to find a reason. I'm devastated, I have always had long pretty hair and it is just allover the place. Please if you have had a problem with hairloss please contact me! Thank you!
354: I have Interstiatial cystitis sand this has been a god send to help me sleep. I highly recommend it. Prior to taking, I was getting maybe 3-4 hrs a night of rest, now, sometimes sleep 5 hours straight through, up to the bathroom once, and back to sleep. More patients with I/c should have knowledge of this medication.
355: I was prescribed this medication for severe anxiety which led to insomnia, I have been on it for over 3 yrs I am now suffering from hypersensitivity to the medication and I have been feeling drugged up for the past 2 months straight I am currently trying to get off this medication as well as ambien they are trying to place me on seroquel not sure how that would be though..
356: I have been taking Lorazepam for 28 years. It has saved my life as I was drinking my self to death.I can now lead a normal life and am never anxious.I am on the same dose 1mg 4x a day as I was back when I started taking it.It was prescribed as I had an acute episode of sheer and utter panic and was sent to a mental institution. I also take anti depressants.  I am happy and have been so for a long time.
357: It works great, my anxiety is near "0" and have had no panic attacks. The only "bad" thing is it makes me very sleepy.I was on Xanax for years and it never made me this tired. I will take the sleepiness, though, if it means no more panic attacks or wild anxiety! Definitely a good med for me!
358: I'm on HepC treatment which has many side effects..im taking.05mg and it has helped relax all my muscles and relieved my migraine's that have been none stop...plan on using a pill every other day to help with my other maintance meds...i will write again in a week to let ya's know how its going
359: I have Post Tramatic Stress Dissorder, with high anxiey do to events in the last 1 1/2 years. I tried Lexapro & it worked fine for about 3 months then it made me more anxous about an hour after taking it, I think I just need to get all my fears out, out of my head I've held them in too long (41 yrs) (I was sexualy abused from age 3 to 12) & no pill can do that for me but Lorazepam helps calm down the errational thought so I can work on my real problems more effectively. I take a .5mg each evening and 1 each day if needed, & 1mg of clonazepam at bedtime for sleep, the better rested the mind the clearer the mind can funtion.Read More Read Less
360: It's helped me with my anxiety and with some of my depression. along with other issues and problems I'm having.  Used properly, this drug works great.
361: i take .5mg for anxiety attacks. this medication works very well. i still feel like myself except that i am no longer anxious. ive heard of drugs that make you feel like you are in a fog or out of your body and this drug is not like that at all.
362: Praise God, finally a night of sleep instead of awake all night in "muscle-spasm coughing".
363: It works very well. But I have to be careful at bedtime. It can cause me to have intense dreams that reduce my good sleep quality.
364: I am a very high strung bi-polar recovering drug addict so you can imagine the anxiety I go through.  Ativan has made me so calm and mellow and easier to get along with.
365: This medication was prescribed to help me get to sleep. It was useless. It said you could double the dosage if needed. Again useless. After awhile I stopped taking it all together.
366: This drug worked miracles for my panic attacks, but because of the risk of addiction, my doctor prescribed only six pills. Since then, two doctors and three therapists have refused to prescribe it to me because of the amount of people who abuse it.
367: It has helped me sleep well,
368: helps me to calm down and relax so, I can go to sleep
369: at first i was fine with this drug, but now i am completely dependent on it and am not getting the same relief that i did at first. the withdrawls are terrifing but this drug is impossible to get off. anyone who has gotten off this drug successfully, please let me know how you did it.
370: Teva 2mg is fake pill. I pay for these monthly..been taking them my whole life. I   rely on them medically. The pills I bought for dec 2022 are placebo. This is upsetting that the medication we are prescribed is not what it is. Ridiculous. Needs investigated.
371: WORKS WONDERS! BUT DO NOT TAKE IT AT 11 PM BEFORE YOU GO TO BED! ( WELL WAS NOT A GOOD IDEA FOR ME! ) I SLEPT RIGHT THRU MY ALARM CLOCK AND WAS LATE FOR WORK! BUT OTHER THEN THAT IT WORKS AMAZING! LUV IT
372: I take Lexapro 10mg every night. Doc wants me to increase to 15mg but I have yet to start the increase. I feel ok on the 10mg. I also take Lorazepam .5mg. She wants me to take it every night but after reading all these reviews I plan to just take it as needed. When I know I'm going to be in a stressful situation I will take it. My panic attacks happen up to 3 times a week because I am anxious & worry a lot. But I take Lorazepam and it mellows me out. I was also experiencing severe nausea with my panic attacks to the point where I couldn't eat. I lost 18 lbs total. Feel much better lately!Read More Read Less
373: I was prescribed this drug by my physician after reporting I had shortage of breath and chest pains, numbness in my arms and dizziness. After talking about the situations when these symptoms took place and some additional testing he determined I was having panic attacks. I was told to take 1/2 of pill when I felt an attack coming on. It worked and has consistently for more than 2-years. I don't take it daily, only when I feel an attack or when I know I'm going to be in a situation that might bring one on. Also, I was diagnosed with IBS, usually also brought on by stressful situations (public speaking, meetings, etc) and this is resolved by taking the medication as well. I have, however, increased the dosage to one entire pill. If I don't use it for more than a couple weeks and then take it, side effects such as slight lightheaded-ness or dizziness, but not enough to make me not want to take it by any means. My physician put me on a very low dosage of Prozac to take on a daily basis to replace the Lorazepam because he was afraid I might develop a dependency, but I still occasionally would need the Lorazepam for panic attacks. I have quit taking the Prozac and only rely on the Lorazepam for attacks or prevention because I was never taking it regularly enough to develop dependency. I appreciate the calmness, decrease of worry and sense of ease resulting from the drug and the lack of any negative side effects.Read More Read Less
374: It works for me and I do not sleep-walk like I did on Adivan.
375: Helps me relax  andnot anxious
376: IHAVE BEEN HAVING SLOW BREATHING NAUSEA,TIREDNESS ALL SEEM TO BE GIVING ME PROBLEMS. SO MANY SIDE EFFECTS TO MENTION. A DR. JUST GAVE THIS TO ME JUST TO GIVE ME SOMETHING. I HAVE BEEN REALIZING THAT THESE MEDS. ARE FROM SPECIALISTS. THANKS FOR YOU HELPFUL INFORMATION     JANE
377: Patient was prescribed 1 or 2 .05 tablets every 6 to 8 hrs as needed. Patient is in recovery from oxy. He is double dosing. Is this drug a narcotic? Is it addictive?
378: Be careful this medication has serious withdrawals.  I have been taking 1/2 to 1 mg every other night for sleeping disorder for over 2 yrs.  I decided to stop taking Lorazepam because of memory loss and heartburn. I had such severe withdrawals (headaches, heart racing, weakness, fatigue, nausea, sleeplessness) I had to go back on it.  I am now weening myself from it more gradually.
379: can this be taken while breast feedng?
380: This medicine did not make me sleepy. Didn't keep me asleep. Did not feel rested if I slept.
381: Ativan calms my nerves..it stops my panic attacks and helps me control my irrational thoughts..I been feeling awesome.
382: Have been on .5mg as needed for 20 years for anxiety.  No side effects.  Works within 20 min. on empty stomach.  Helps a little with depression also. Has been a life saver.  Can't take too often (daily), or is less effective.  Take 2-4 x/week.
383: I GET ANXIETIC ATTACKS, THIS MED. HAS HELP ME ALOT, USED FOR4 MONTHS NOW 1 OR 2 DEPENDS ON MY MOOD
384: I have had a good experience taking it before bed time.sometimes I have had to take 2 pills on the days I have been really anxious.I have noticed that I have less nightmares as well!
385: Have been taking nortryptiline for many years against mild depression which provided stability and balance. Had major surgery and chemo 4 years ago and was given Ativan/lorazepam for sleep. Kept it for a few months after leaving the hospital then was able to discontinue it, then had more sleeplessness so started again. Taking 1/2 of 1mg tablet most nights. Tried taking even smaller dosage but sleep got worse. Seemed the med was not helping me, skipped it but on second day was awake until 6am. Took 1/2 mg last night and was able to sleep. It works but is a benzodiazepine therefore difficult to withdraw. My PCP only lets me have 14 pills at a time, thinks side effects and addiction are a risk. Works well most of the timeRead More Read Less
386: i only use as needed,i fine it works very well.i have used it for 7or more years,no side affects.
387: I've put on over 15# in the few months I've been on this. No change in appetite. Anybody else find this to be a problem? I'm not overweight, but curious if I should try another medication? I'm not too happy with the way it's working. Also wondering why I was put on strongest anti-anxiety as a starting place. I see Dr on Monday and will go from there. Any suggestions as to what works beter as an anti-anxiety? My husband is terminally ill so I do need the help on the meds as well as the therapist and psychiatrist who covers meds only. ThanksRead More Read Less
388: anxiety
389: helps me sleep when i am nervous
390: I was given this for abdominal pain, cause unknown.  It has caused me to have headaches and hallucinations, but has not helped to ease my pain other than by making me so drugged I'm asleep and can't feel anything.
391: i have been useing this product for over 30 years....no one bothered to take me off, have tried doing so and got so nervous i could nt do mu daily chores, would like for some one to help me out here, pat thank u
392: I am deathly afraid of the dentist.  I can manage a cleaning but all other work is horrible for me.  I didn't go to the dentist for years because of my anxiety.  I know take this medicine before I go to the dentist and have absolutely no anxiousness or dread.  I am not a regular user of his medicine.  I only use the medicine prior to dentist appointments which are 1-2 times per year.  Because oral health has been tied to the health of the rest of our bodies, this medicine may have literally saved my life.Read More Read Less
393: After CVS started using this brand, I found it was not effective and did nothing. It was like all the reviews said about it...ineffective and doesn't work. This needs to be shut down immediately for fraud making pills
394: this does seem to be some what of a difficult medicaiton to stop taking
395: sleep without waking for no reason. Some drogginess during the day..but  can take that to get a better night's sleep.
396: Currently taking to treat severe anxiety and Panic Attacks.  Works like a charm.  Drowsiness is there but for me it is very mild and I can still function without issue.  I finally think clearly again and have started to relearn my surroundings.  It's like I've been lifted from a heavy fog :)
397: overdose
398: i am on hospice care  my wife was and still is in the hospital for lukemia treatment. chemo..   she hada rough time had to be intubated, she almost died. due to my condition i was unable to go see her, she WAS IN UCLA OVER  5 HOURSAWAY...
399: Lorazepam helps me to relax when I am feeling extremely anxious but it also leaves me feeling very tired.  I definitely would not attempt after taking this medication.
400: Since starting this medication, I find I do not have as many attacks. And if I take one before bed I can sleep. I have had no side affects for this med.
401: I started taking the drug 4 yrs ago at 0.5mg 2X per day. It immediately solved my anxiety problem driven by my son's car crash accident and his bipolar behavior. The drug quickly eliminated my anxiety after waking up in the am and taking coffee. It stopped my teeth jumping. I considered it a miracle. I still take it every day for waking up and going to sleep. Yes I still have my mood disorder, but believe the drug helps somewhat. I am 69 yrs old.
402: i have severe social anxiety as well as panic attacks. i also have severe tension, fidgiting, pacing, fast heart beat, cannot  relax or be calm at all.
403: I get very nervous in certain situations and asked the doctor if there was anything he could prescribe.  He prescribed Lorazepam and I am so happy with the results!  I do not take it everyday maybe once a month if that, in high stress situations and it works wonders!  I am very happy!
404: calms me down but i have a hard time taking during the day, it makes me want to fall asleep. but it does help with my IBS.
405: i finally found something that not only reduces anxiety, but also helps to alleviate migraines as well. Of course, Iam sure they are related anyway.
406: awsome
407: it does seem to help however i have found xanax to do a better job! since both theis meds are in the same catogory
408: Doctor prescribed 1 mg to help with anxiety due to stress of husband's illneses, his cargiving for 6 years and death last year.  I still use it as needed on the days I am 'coming out of my skin', generally only a few times a week.  This has been a great help to get me past those bad days, and to date, I have had no real side effects.  It would be wise for anyone to understand and keep in mind those possible side effects.
409: panic attacks helps clam me down
410: It has saved me many times from having grand mal seizures.
411: I would wake at all hours of the night maybe sleeping a total of 4 hrs.  After taking Lorazepam I sleep through the night with no interruptions.
412: helps take the edge off, calming
413: Have been taking for a couple years for anxiety attacks. I only take as needed and now I pretty much carry the bottle in my purse as a saftey blanket, but rarely have to actually take a pill. However, if you are taking this for anxiety it should not be the only thing you are taking for your condition. You need to be on a everyday medication as well, this will decrease your need to take the pill and decrease your chances of dependancey. My Dr. will not perscribe this medication alone, I have to take my Effexor to get this script. But when you have a bad bout with anxiety, this is a great pill to have handy!! Usually brings me down in about 5 minutes. Also useful for help sleeping,I normally take Ambien everynight but if it gets to late or I don't feel like taking the Ambien, 1 or 2 of these and I am fast asleep....usually for the entire night! Read More Read Less
414: I have been on so many medications that I couldn't even begin to write all of them down.  Lorazepam is by far, the best medication that I have ever taken.  Addictive or not, I haven't seen any other results, like I see with this med.  I feel happy again, I am not tired, I smile, and do not self destruct worrying about every little part of life.  I would recommend this drug to anyone who just simply wants to feel better!!
415: foun in my sons drawer it  white says mylan 777 what is it?
416: I am interested in a plan to get off this med.  I have been taking 2mg twice a day for 1 year
417: I would like to get off it,But i am scared too.i have been told i could die.It is so scarey.what if we have a catastrophy and i cant get my med,?i no ,sounds crazy,But i think about those kinds of things,What if i cant find another doctor to prescribe it for me?I  would like to stop taking it.but i anm so scared that just any rehab won't treat me properley,I have children to raise,Please help me.I have been taking adivan for 14 years,and today i am 38 years old,Thank you Gina
418: I am a heavy person, higher MGs of this has brought my stress level down a great deal. I am very happy with the result. I just wish that doctors were not so tight or overly careful on prescribing something so helpful.
419: i feel i am dependent on this medication.  when i try to go off gradually i have lots of dreams and general feeling of tiredness and less sleep.  i worry about what the long term effect will be.
420: I do well with this medication but it is very expensive and my medical coverage doesn't cover it, is their another drug similar to this that works the same way and is cheaper? Advice would be greatly appreciated.
421: I was suffering from severe panic attacks. to the point I was going to the hospital. I could not be around the thing I love the most my three year old son. I was in bed for 4 days. my doctor put me on this med to take when I felt the attacks coming. I have been on this med for 6 months and I amm able to live a normal life again.
422: 0.5mg at night--- I am on a CPAP machine for snoring and this drug helps with the anxiety that comes with wearing the mask. It also has helped with the everyday troubles we all face depression and anxiety just feel better taking it. Tried 0.25 to start not enough like the 0.5 better
423: My father In-law has been taking 2 lorazepam a day for almost 3 year he is now having to take 3 and is still having a little problem. His Dr put him on prozac its been 10 days his footing is off he is 82 and very with it he can drive and take care of his shopping but for the last 4 day he is really not him self I am afraid for him what level of dose age can an 82 year old man take?
424: I only take .5mg for anxiety when traveling by plane. It has been a God-send. I take one the night before and one when I get to the airport. I can now travel again and do not get anxious when taking this. Tiny bit of light-headedness but I am still aware of everything.
425: I'm use to clonazepam but because I just started lorazepam its not working as good as clonazepam.  I'm going to give it a chance at least 2 to 3 weeks to see if it kicks in my system and starts working just as good as the clonazepam. I'm quite sure it will because when I was going through alcohol withdrawal and benzo withdrawal at the hospital inpatient it was working for me but it took a couple days to kick in and it didn't last as long as clonazepam. pray for me and give me some feedback please... does lorazepam last as long as clonazepam?Read More Read Less
426: I have bipolar anxiety and muscle spasms from cerebral palsy.  Stress makes my spasms worse.  Too much stress also my make anxiety/mania levels begin to crawl upwards.  My Doctor gives a certain amount of 1mg. lorazepam pills per day.  I am instructed to take these pills PRN(as I need it.)  I take ativan when stress builds and my anxiety/mania starts to effect me or when my palsy spasms get painful.  The lorazepam calms all these things.  Me getting to take the ativan whenever I get symptoms instead at a set time (say at night)works out really well and I get the full benefit of the drug when I really need it.Read More Read Less
427: I want to know if this drug Lorazepam causes constipation...Please answer.
428: I take this medication as a result of pain issues.  This medication enhances the benefit of Methadone.  It does have a bad withdrawl, perhaps as bad as any narcotic.  Anyone who's offered this medication should heavily consider how long they'll be on it and at what dose.  I have run out of this medication from my doctor failing to watch my refills and it is truly a lousy experience going through withdrawl.
429: Long term statistics?
430: This drug was given to me to help me with withdrawals from Percocet taken for knee surgery.  It helped some but it seemed to make me need to urinate constantly, blurred my vision, interrupted my sleep, and gave me the shakes in the morning.  I only took .5mg for ten days.  Since then I have been going through some withdrawals from it but they are slowly going away.  I will never take this drug again.
431: cant sleep due to chronic pain 2 stars
432: Very effective at controlling panic attacks and general anxiety.  It also relieves headaches and nausea caused by anxiety.
433: I believe it has caused my mother,s memory to get worse
434: This Crud is very addictive. at least for me, and i suffer from very sever panic attacks on pretty much a daily basis, i started taking 0.5mg as directed by my docter and gradualy started taking 2mg 2x or 3x a day. withdrawal symptoms where aweful took about 5 weeks to ween off this medication
435: I HAVE NOTICED BALDNESS WITH THIS MED AND AM AFRAID TO COME OFF OF IT.
436: Caused loss of bladder control
437: I take one to two .5mg pills for panic attacks or sometimes just particularly intense anxiety. I usually have to take 2 as I don't feel much from one, but 1mg is just enough to relax me and un-tense my body without making me too tired or unfocused.
438: I needed to get off of zolpidem started getting up at night eating and did not even know it. That scare me also was involved in a robbery and had a gun stuck in my face, so I started having panic attacks when I went out side.. had to go to a therapist for counseling was telling her about getting off of the zolpidem, so she gave me lorazepam it has been a miracle drug for me. I take 1 0.5 at night and I sleep so good, have not had any side effects, and every now and then I take one doing the day if I feel a panic attack coming on. I Love It Read More Read Less
439: In 2007 I had a stroke at 44. It left me with terrible anxiety. So they gave me an antianxiety med for long term plus lorazepam. It works wonders and I have been on it for 15 years. Just taken as needed.
440: Ativan was given to my father as a "chemical restraint" in the hospital.  I guess the night nurse didn't feel like doing much that night.  My father was still completely sedated 14 hours later.  My husband was given Ativan at a different hospital after he asked the nurse to turn down a beeping monitor so he could sleep; she gave him ativan instead. He was out of it for 20 hours.  When I found out they had given my father ativan and complained, the nurse practitioner told me, "We can give him anything we want!"   Another nurse told me Ativan is used regularly in the hospital.  Nurses need to know that is not a drug to give just any patient.  Both my father and husband had sleep apnea, and ativan could have depressed their respiratory systems and killed them.  Read More Read Less
441: I take this only a couple times a month, when anxiety is really bad. It works well most of the time, but every once in a while, axiety comes back. Also, DO NOT combine with alcohol. I had a glass of wine about 7 hours after taking one, and I felt seriously intoxicated.
442: it helps with acid reflux. much better than acid reducing drugs and no side effects
443: It totally relaxes me so I can fall asleep in the evening. I start work at 6am (up at 5am)and its very difficult to go to sleep before 11pm unless I take a couple Lorazepams. The downfall now is that I'm addicted to it. I can't seem to fall asleep now without taking at least one Lorazepam, even on the weekends.
444: Helps me sleep, a lack of which often trigger a manic episode. It also does not make me fall back into the depressive phase as easily as with medications such as Stilnox
445: Helps me go to sleep, but possibly causing problems with short-term memory loss.  Have started using 1/2 dose.
446: Sometimes I can fall asleep easy, other times I'm up all night. Then, I can go to sleep and wake up evey two hours. After I/ve tried all night, I am so worn out that by 6am, I can finally go to sleep out of pure exhaustion.
447: I had moderate to sever anxiet issues due to alot of factors in life. I've had a history of susbstance abuse yrs ago and was told by doctor that he'd start me on a low dose for. I take 2 mg a day and feel great. It helps in so many ways and is highly recommended.
448: It made me feel I could go out and be and do  things others were.  This with medication, my anxiety decreases immensely.
449: I take 2mg 3 times a day. I have been taking Lorazapam for about 2 months. My entire life i have had social anxiety and  nowq as I grow older the strangest things will bring on an attack. Today I'm having a new washer and dryer delivered and just waiting for the delivery has thrown me into a severe attack. I just wish I knew WHY I get these attacks out of nowhere. Having anxiety just waiting for a delivery is crazy! The Lorazapam helps me but doesn't take all the anxiousness away.
450: I like the instant relief you get after taking the Ativan, because anxiety is scary. What I dont like is the withdrawls you get after taking the med.
451: more calm
452: I was proscribed this drug for anxiety, and it worked great. I however had the reaction of severe hiccups as a side effect. I was then put on oxazepam, which is similar and not only was it more effective, but no hiccups.
453: it simply put me back to me
454: Was prescribed this medication for anxiety panic attacks. Worked pretty good for me, after cutting them down! Just had one problem. I think the doc made a error writing out Rx and I got 10mg pills instead of 1mg that I think is the normal dose when first starting on them. I worked 10 hr shifts at night, 5:00pm to 3:00am, with 20 minute paid break for lunch, 4 nights a week. After working the last night for the week I took one of these at 3:20:am Fri. to help relax and go to sleep. Woke up late afternoon Sat. Can't remember anything I did for over 36 hrs! A married Lady friend told me I called her to come over for coffee at 8:00am Fri & acted like a fool all day, would only put on a pair of purple silk boxer shorts I had, & refused to get dressed in anything else. She managed to keep me in the house all day and got me to go to sleep around midnight. I had no memory of any of this at all! I was a completely different person and was up from Thur. morning to about midnight Fri. Maybe longer. So do not try these the first time when you're alone! Read More Read Less
455: i took this medication last night, and i am still awake, been up for 36 hours now.  usually my average sleep is 2-4 hours a day!
456: Gets rid of my anxiety, helps me sleep, and calms my stomach.
457: Lorazepam is the only med that works for me.Tried Ambien, Trazadone, Doxepin before for a short time.Did not work plus terrible side effects.Lorazepam puts me on a smooth ride throughout the day plus easy 7-8 hour sleep for night.No sude effects just a little calmness if you have anxiety plus great sleep with no nightmares.Withaut Lorazepam i can only a few hours.
458: When I get very upset and shake from being nervous or csared I put one under my tongue and in about 5 Min. I feel calm and not nervous I only take it when needed and if I realy have trouble sleeping for about a week I seem to get insomnia a lot, I take 1 and sleep all nite.But I dont do this often
459: I used to take this med for anxiety. It works wonderful, but it is addicting. I was worse when I got off the med.  Anxiety was worse and my muscles ached.  I went to a meditation class and now I now feel normal and no meds of any type.  Works great if  you only need it to fly or once in a great while.  Very addicting.
460: I have started to take this medicine only as necessary. For anxiety that I get a few times a week. I waited for 45 minutes to get the full effect, I was calm and it helped me sleep.
461: I have Anxiety and Panic Attacks. The Dr. started me on Paxil. I took it for 10 days and was extremely tired, sick to my stomach and very shaky  I stopped Paxil and started Ativan 0 5mg.
I only take when needed, maybe 2 times a week. It works perfect for me. I can do things I couldn't do before Ativan. Paxil stressed me out knowing 1 side effect is weight gain of 15Lbs or more. No way!! Anyway Ativan  helped me. I take it during the day when needed. I take Melatonin at night to sleep. All is well!!!Read More Read Less
462: This is a wonderful drug for the treatment of anxiety, however, it is meant for short term use (2-3) weeks. The doctors tell you that, they do not, however, tell you what can happen if you take for a long period of time. I have been taking Lorazepam for 6 years, 1 mg/twice a day. Prior to that I was on Xanax for 10 years.I have now become tolerant and am having withdrawal symptoms. I have done quite a bit of research on this and withdrawal can last years or even decades. This drug needs to be tapered off VERY slowly for a minimum of about 10 months. Some people have terrible withdrawal symptoms for years after stopping this medication. It messes with the Gaba receptors in your brain as well as your central nervous system. Read the Ashton Manual. Doctors keep prescribing these types of drugs because they are getting kickbacks from 'Big Pharma' to do so. Do your research and get off this horrible drug if you have been on for a long time.Read More Read Less
463: I have taken this medication since my first cancer and it works wonderful, for restlessness and anxiety. I take 2 mg 3x a day
464: I am experiencing  pretty much of all the side affects. it puts me to sleep for about thiry minutes and then I am unable to fall back to sleep; Very sad and tearful. Angry just to mention a few of the things I am feeling.
465: I can not read! Blurred vision! And some sleep--4-5- hrs.
466: Very nervous about surgical procedure that was upcoming. Doctor prescribed 1 mg to be taken one hour before surgury.  It calmed me down throughout the surgury--worked great for me.
467: I GOT TERRIBLE HEADACHES FROM THIS MEDICATION.
468: I'm on 1mg pills and only take when I am about to be in a situation where I am going to be stressed (usually when I fly). They work well when I'm having a bad day in the office as well. Work fast and does the trick of taking the edge off.
469: I take it only as needed for anxiety/panic. Reading other's reviews it seems that regular use causes most problems. I use once/week at most and no problems - all benefits for me. But after reading other reviews I think I am going to try more biofeedback/meditation before I use the meds. Often just knowing the crutch is there makes it easier to use mind control.
470: used it for nicotine withdraw helps  but needed to take it more than the every 8 hrs prescribed
471: I can finally sleep again for 6 hour straight without waking up.
472: I have been taking this drug (1mg. 3X a day) for over 10 years, and it has been wonderful. I didn't even need it 3X a day! I have alot of pain problems and am disabled, so I go to a pain specialist. He had me on a methadone compound for pain and the combination of that and the lorazepam put me in a 3 day coma!! (come to find out methadone and a benzodiazapine are a DEADLY combination!! I'm not on any of that anymore, but my anxiety is still horrible!! I've been on all kinds of anti anxiety medicines, and NO ONE has worked as well as thes lorazepam has! I plan to get back on it at my next Dr. apt.Read More Read Less
473: Did not help anxiety. Caused insomnia.
474: This pill does nothing for me.  I have a tracheostomy tube in my neck, and my anxiety is through the roof.  I have taken this medication for over 2 years, and it has never decreased my anxiety level not once.
475: DOES NOT WORKTO WELL
476: I have fibromyalgia and ptsd. I have just started (30 days) taking low dose 0.5 mg daily and have noticed improvements in both conditions.  I like it much better than other medications because it works so gently that you barely notice it--it feels natural, not drugged. There were a few times that anxiety broke through, but they were mild.  I plan to continue using it.
477: I use Lorazepam in conjunction with Prozac (or Fluoxetine). I don't use it very often, only as perscribed by my doctor for very acute "macic" events or events where anxiety or depression are most likely to affect me. I am on 40mg Prozac and that works the best for me. The .5mg Lorazepam (Ativan) works good for me just every once in a while when I really feel that I need it.
478: I have been on this medication for 2 years, after I had the worst anxiety attack in my life.  Since I have been on it I can drive without having a panic attack in traffic, I now don't have to worry about having to pull over to the side of the road anymore or wish for a police car to be near me. I do wonder what the long term ramifications are for using it for many years.
479: I have been on Lorazepam for just over 10 years.  I was up to 2mg 3 times a day for several years.  My new doctor told me that the amount I was taking was too much.  Now I am down to 120 1 mg pills per month.  This drug really works well, but over time you build a tolerance and become dependant.  I wish the doctors would have told me that when I was having panick attacks and i was deperate for releif.  This drug is definitely not meant for long term use.  I need to keep weening myself off this drug, espcially because I want to have children soon.  Mentally this is a huge struggle because they have been my crutch for so many years.  Just know these do work, but hard to stop taking after prolonged use.Read More Read Less
480: I took a milligram to help myself sleep before a big day and woke up several hours latter vomiting and with diarrhea. This continued for the next ten hours, rendering me weak and useless.
481: I have been taking this drug for years. I used to wake up in the middle of the night and once my brain started thinking I could not go back to sleep. I find this drug works with you. If you are going to sleep it slows your mind down so you can sleep. If you take it during the day for anxiety it slows your anxious thinking down but does not make you (me) lethargic. I take 2mg a night and very rarely during the day. I guess it's a good thing that I am scared to not take as directed. One side note. I went away for the night and did not have any and my sleep was very restleness and I woke up a lot. I hope this only means that the drug is working as it is supposed to and if you don't have it you are back to where you started. Addiction is scary to me. Can you be addicted even if you take as directed and never up the dose?Read More Read Less
482: I only take half of a tablet each night and it helps me to sleep. Taking it was on advice of my doctor. I do not take every night, maybe 2-3 times a week.
483: menopause could not sleep
484: The doctor gave this drug to me for "restless leg syndrome" for me it worked.
485: I take lorazapam to coontrol seizures along with depakote. I also take propanol to help control my "depakote shakes"
486: Im able to focus more. Im able to remain calm in stressful situations and I dont get upset over little things.
487: Under the tounge, 5 mins. sleeping. Didn't happen. Seemed to make it harder to sleep. Garbage.
488: did nothing for me.  now what
489: I had an anxiety attach and the ER doctor gave me Ativan, 1mg.  My primary DR prescribed .5 mg per day as needed.  I admit I take Ativan (Lorezepam) to sleep or to relax when I take long road trips and not necessarily for Anxiety.  But...here is the bad part...a few months ago, I noticed hair in the drain.  Hair in the sink.  The pillow.  Everywhere.  I did not have thick hair anyway, but now, my ponytail is so thin and limp, the hair loss is really bad.   At first I was told Ativan was not the cause.  Now, I see, it certainly can be.  So, I am taking a tiny .025 dose a day to get off of it.  I guess I will have to find another way to sleep and relax because losing hair makes me far less calm than anything else!  BEWARE if you want your HAIR!Read More Read Less
490: none
491: I have a very stressful job. I have been on this medication for 5 years. It works for me but for only 5 hours.  Not sure of the side effects.
492: I have a lot of symptoms if I run out early , I can't sleep at all . Headaches , tremendous anxiety attacks , can't eat ( or won't ) . If I knew how addicting it was I never would have started it . In the past Valium was what I was taking and that helped my back , since I have a bad syatica problem along with needing a total hip replacement .
493: Allows me to eat, and suppresses constant retching
494: Just beware: this drug has a pwerful and dangerous withdrawal. Recommendations are to reduce by 10% every 2 weeks to avoid (sometimes not) withdrawal calamities. My husband emerged from 1 day of withdrawal blind and cognitively disoriented. He never recovered.
495: taken on time foe anxiety
496: i have been having a severe rash which i just realized is from this drug. any suggestions as to what i should do???
497: works great for anxiety but makes me nauseas
